S.  HRG.  110–1169 

NOMINATIONS  TO  THE  DEPARTMENT  OF 

TRANSPORTATION,  THE  NATIONAL 

AERONAUTICS  AND  SPACE  ADMINISTRATION,  AND 

THE  DEPARTMENT  OF  COMMERCE 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  31,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

75–740 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 31, 2007 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Barrett,  Vice  Admiral  Thomas  J.,  USCG  (Ret.),  Nominee  to  be  Deputy  Sec-
retary, U.S. Department of Transportation  .......................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Biographical information  .................................................................................
Brubaker,  Paul  R.,  Nominee  to  be  Administrator,  Research  and  Innovative 
Technology Administration, U.S. Department of Transportation  ....................
Biographical information  .................................................................................
Cohen,  Hon.  William  S.,  former  U.S.  Senator,  Maine;  former  Secretary,  U.S. 
Department of Defense  ........................................................................................
Murkowski, Hon. Lisa, U.S. Senator from Alaska  .........................................
Spoehel,  Ronald  R.,  Nominee  to  be  Chief  Financial  Officer,  National  Aero-
nautics and Space Administration  ......................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Biographical information  .................................................................................
Sutton, Rear Admiral William, USN (Ret.), Nominee to be Assistant Secretary 
for Manufacturing and Services, U.S. Department of Commerce  ....................
Biographical information  .................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Trent  Lott  to  Ronald  R. 
Spoehel  ..................................................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  John  D.  Rockefeller  IV 
to Vice Admiral Thomas J. Barrett  ....................................................................
..........
Snowe, Hon. Olympia J., U.S. Senator from Maine, prepared statement 
...................
Stevens, Hon. Ted, U.S. Senator from Alaska, prepared statement 
Warner, Hon. John, U.S. Senator from Virginia, prepared statement  ................

Page 
1 
1 

5 
6 
7 

19 
20 

2 
3 

27 
28 
29 

34 
36 

46 

47 
45 
45 
46 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

NOMINATIONS  TO  THE  DEPARTMENT  OF 

TRANSPORTATION,  THE  NATIONAL 

AERONAUTICS  AND  SPACE  ADMINISTRATION, 

AND  THE  DEPARTMENT  OF  COMMERCE 

TUESDAY,  JULY  31,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The Committee met, pursuant to notice, at 9:59 a.m. in room SR– 
253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Daniel K. Inouye, Chair-
man of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The  CHAIRMAN.  The  nominees  before  us  today  have  been  called 
upon  to  lead  in  diverse  areas  of  our  Government,  and  I  look  for-
ward to the opportunity to hear their views on how their past expe-
riences  will  assist  them  in  addressing  the  challenges  posed  by 
these positions. 

Vice  Admiral  Barrett,  we  are  depending  on  you  to  offer  steady 
leadership  at  the  Department  of  Transportation,  and  make  certain 
that  the  safety  of  our  Nation’s  transportation  system  remains  the 
top  priority  of  the  agency.  At  the  same  time,  I’m  certain  you  will 
encourage  advancements  that  can  enhance  our  national  transpor-
tation system and improve the movement of goods and services and 
people across the United States. 

Funding  for  our  Nation’s  aviation  programs  will  be  a  particular 
challenge.  The  FAA  has  seen  massive  cuts  to  their  facilities  and 
equipment accounts since FY 2004. These practical cuts, if not cor-
rected  soon,  will  jeopardize  our  international  leadership  in  aero-
space,  and  damage  our  ability  to  address  the  capacity  and  conges-
tion  we  are  now  experiencing  in  our  skies.  And  I’m  certain  you’ll 
provide  direction  at  the  Department  of  Transportation  to  make 
sure that aviation needs are properly funded. 

Truck  and  rail  safety  and  the  reauthorization  of  Amtrak  are  ad-
ditional areas that will challenge you. Given your proven record of 
working  with  the  Congress,  and,  more  specifically,  with  this  Com-
mittee,  I  think  we  can  expect  you  to  meet  these  and  other  chal-
lenges very successfully. 

In the Department of Transportation, research and technological 
advancements  are  keys  to  expanding  our  transportation  system  so 
we  can  meet  our  society’s  growing  demands  and  continue  to  grow 
our economy. We’ll be counting on you, Mr. Brubaker, to make cer-

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

2 

tain  the  agency  evaluates  and  develops  new  technologies  quickly 
and effectively so can be implemented as soon as practicable. 

Admiral  Sutton,  it’s  a  pleasure  to  welcome  the  former  Com-
mander  of  Naval  Station  Pearl  Harbor.  You  are  now  called  upon 
to  be  the  voice  of  America’s  manufacturers  as  they  face  the  chal-
lenges  of  globalization.  The  entire  manufacturing  sector  generated 
just 12.1 percent of U.S. gross domestic product in 2006, compared 
with  17  and  a  half  percent  in  1986.  Manufacturing  employment 
dropped from 17.2 million in 1996 to just over 14 million as of last 
year. So, obviously you have a great challenge ahead of you. 

Mr.  Spoehel  will  be  called  upon,  among  other  things,  to  improve 
NASA’s  financial  management  system  and  address  weaknesses  in 
NASA’s  contracting  system  identified  by  the  Government  Account-
ability Office. 

On  behalf  of  the  Committee,  I  thank  all  of  you  for  your  willing-
ness to serve our Nation in these very important positions, and I’d 
like to call upon you. Before you do, I have two very distinguished 
citizens of the United States who wish to be heard. 

First, the Honorable William S. Cohen, Member of the Senate, a 
distinguished  one,  at  one  time,  and  a  former  Secretary  of  Defense. 

Secretary Cohen? 

STATEMENT OF HON. WILLIAM S. COHEN, 

FORMER U.S. SENATOR, MAINE; FORMER SECRETARY, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE 

Secretary COHEN. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
And  let  the  record  show—Mr.  Chairman,  perhaps  the  record 
should show your dedication to efficiency, that you actually started 
the hearing 1 minute before the appointed hour, and that that tes-
tifies to your commitment to efficiency and productivity. 

But let me thank you for allowing me to come and testify before 
you this morning. As you pointed out, I had the privilege of serving 
with  you  for  18  years,  and  we  worked  together  in  an  indirect  way 
when  I  was  a  member  of  the  House  of  Representatives  during  the 
Watergate  period,  where  I  served  on  the  House  Judiciary  Com-
mittee and you were on the Watergate Committee, and then, subse-
quent to that, some 12 years or more later, on the Iran-Contra In-
vestigation. And I just want the record to show what extraordinary 
respect  I  have  for  you  and  the  honor  with  which  you  have  served 
as a member of the Senate, and, prior to that, as a heroic member 
of our Armed Forces. 

So,  thank  you  for  allowing  me  to  come  before  you  this  morning. 
I  would  like  to,  first,  acknowledge  Paul  Brubaker’s  wife,  Carolyn, 
and  his  sons,  Jackson  and  Gavin,  who  are  sitting  behind  me,  and 
also  welcome  Paul’s  mother-in-law,  Ruth  Ann  Renford,  to  the  pro-
ceeding. 

And  I  want  you  to  know  how  much  pleasure  and  pride  I  take  in 
introducing  Paul  today,  to  endorse  his  nomination  to  become  Ad-
ministrator of the Department of Transportation’s Research and In-
novative Technology Administration. 

Paul  began  working  for  me  and  the  staff  of  the  Senate  Govern-
mental  Affairs  Committee  back  in  1992,  on  the  oversight  Com-
mittee that I was chairing and that Senator Levin was the Ranking 
Member.  He  began  his  position  as  an  investigator,  which—for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

3 

which he was well suited, having served some 6 years at GAO, and, 
within a very short time, I had promoted him as Staff Director, be-
cause of his great drive and enthusiasm, a position which was pre-
ceded  by  another  distinguished  Member  of  this  body,  Senator 
Susan Collins. 

Paul  was  deeply  involved  in  many  of  the  investigations  and  the 
reform proposals that grew out of those hearings that were held by 
Senator  Levin  and  me,  and  perhaps  most  notably  was  one  of  the 
leading  forces  behind  the  1996  Clinger-Cohen  Act,  which  reformed 
the Government’s IT procurement processes. I’d like to note, for the 
record, that, in Maine, we call it the Cohen-Clinger Act, but, none-
theless, the official title is Clinger-Cohen. 

Paul—when  I  went  to  the  Department  of  Defense,  Paul  joined 
me,  and  then  served  as  Deputy  Chief  Information  Officer,  and 
later,  he  was  the  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  of  Defense  for  C4I. 
He  applied  his  great  political,  policy,  and  budgetary  skills  to  ad-
minister  department-wide  IT  initiatives  that  affected  our  soldiers, 
sailors,  airmen,  and  marines  around  the  world,  and  he  brought 
great  energy,  creativity,  and  private-sector  experience  to  policies 
and  investments  in  technology  and  the  communications  that  bene-
fited the DOD enterprise. 

After he left government, in 2001, he built two small businesses, 
from  the  ground  up.  In  his  current  position,  as  CEO  of  Procentrix, 
Inc., he has provided his customers with dramatic improvements in 
mission performance. In 6 months, Paul turned Procentrix into one 
of  the  Federal  Computer  Week’s  top  ten  organizations  for  the  year 
2006. And, again, he proves his talent for facing very complex chal-
lenges. 

The  Research  and  Innovative  Technology  Administration  within 
the  Department  of  Transportation,  it  performs  a  vital  function  in 
America’s transportation network. We see increasing evidence that 
transportation  technology  is  intimately  tied  to  America’s  security 
and commerce, our public health and civic life. 

September  11,  Hurricane  Katrina,  and  the  war  in  Iraq  have 
shown us that a successful RITA Administrator must be able to see 
beyond the bits and bytes of information technology to grasp a larg-
er picture, and that’s one of Paul’s many strengths. 

America’s  transportation  technology  needs  will  test  an  adminis-
trator’s  vision,  his  critical-thinking,  and  problem-solving.  And  I 
know  that  Paul  Brubaker  is  going  to  pass  those  tests  with  great 
vigor and grace. He has my highest confidence, and I hope you will 
confirm him for this post. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Secretary. 
And  now,  I  have  the  privilege  of  calling  upon  Alaska’s  Senator, 

Senator Murkowski, daughter of the Governor, and Senator. 

STATEMENT OF HON. LISA MURKOWSKI, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  MURKOWSKI.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  am  de-
lighted  to  be  before  the  Committee  to  introduce  a  friend  and  a  fel-
low  Alaskan,  Vice  Admiral  Thomas  J.  Barrett,  who  is  President 
Bush’s nominee to serve as the Deputy Secretary of Transportation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

4 

I  have  known  Admiral  Barrett  and  his  wife,  Sheila,  since  my 
service  in  the  Alaska  State  legislature,  back  in  Juneau,  when  Ad-
miral  Barrett  was  serving  as  the  Commander  of  the  17th  Coast 
Guard District. At that time, I had an opportunity to come to know 
Admiral  Barrett,  his  wife,  his  family,  just  as  genuine  Alaskans. 
Now, I must tell you, they hail from other parts of the country, but 
we  have  adopted  them  as  Alaskans.  We  know  that  their  heart— 
when they left the state, a part of their heart was left with us, and 
we are glad to call them Alaskans. 

I  would  also  like  to  recognize  not  only  his  wife,  Sheila,  but  also 
his  family.  They  have  four  children;  two  sons,  who  have  served 
honorably in Iraq. The family has contributed in so many different 
ways. 

Admiral Barrett has a very distinguished background: graduated 
from the Coast Guard Officer Candidate School, was commissioned 
in  1969,  served  in  Vietnam,  earned  a  law  degree  from  George 
Washington,  graduated  in  residence  from  the  Army  War  College. 
He, as I indicated, had served as the Commander of the 17th Coast 
Guard District in Alaska, but, again, responsibilities and duties all 
over,  including  the  Office  of  Chief  Counsel,  the  project  staff  for 
Outer  Continental  Shelf  Safety,  Security,  and  Environmental  Pro-
tection.  He  truly,  again,  has  served  our  country  with  distinction 
and honor. 

I  was  able  to  introduce  Admiral  Barrett  at  a  hearing,  just  last 
year, when he was named as the first Pipeline and Hazardous Ma-
terial  Safety  Administrator  for  the  Department  of  Transportation. 
That  was  back  in  May  of  2006.  He  served  in  that  capacity  incred-
ibly well. I had the opportunity to deal with him on some very dif-
ficult  issues,  but  found  a  man  who  not  only  knew  his  background, 
but  was  an  incredible  administrator,  incredible  leader,  and  greatly 
appreciated that service. 

He  has  continued  to  hold  that  post  as  the  Pipeline  and  Haz-
ardous Materials Safety Administrator while simultaneously taking 
on  the  duties  as  the  Acting  Deputy  Secretary  of  Transportation. 
This—these additional duties came on in March of this year. 

When  he  contacted  me  to  let  me  know  that  he  had  been  nomi-
nated  by  the  President  for  this,  I  told  him  that  I  had  some  mixed 
feelings.  I  didn’t  want  to  lose  him  and  all  the  focus  that  he  had 
given  in  his  capacity,  but  he  assured  me  that  he  would  remain 
committed  to  all  that  we  had  been  working  on,  while,  at  the  same 
time,  stepping  up  to  assume  the  responsibilities  as  Deputy  Sec-
retary of Transportation. I have every reason to believe that the 40 
years  of  service  that  he  has  provided  to  this  country  will  continue 
to be built upon in an exemplary manner. 

I  am  delighted,  this  morning,  to  introduce  Admiral  Barrett  and 
to  recommend  him  for  confirmation  as  the  Deputy  Secretary  of 
Transportation. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Senator Murkowski. 
Thank you, Mr. Secretary. 
Senator  Olympia  Snowe  has  asked  me  to  announce  her  very 
strong  support  for  the  nomination  of  Mr.  Brubaker,  in  light  of  his 
service to the citizens of the State of Maine. Unfortunately, because 
of scheduling conflicts, she cannot be with us, but she urged me to 
convey her regret in not being able to attend this meeting. Her full 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

5 

statement  in  support  of  Mr.  Brubaker  will  be  made  part  of  the 
record. 

In  addition,  Senators  Warner  and  Webb,  of  Virginia,  have  sub-

mitted statements in support of Mr. Spoehel. 

Our  first  witness  is  Vice  Admiral  Thomas  J.  Barrett,  United 
States  Coast  Guard  (Retired).  He  was  nominated  for  Deputy  Sec-
retary-Designate, U.S. Department of Transportation. 

Admiral Barrett? Would you care to introduce your family? I no-

tice that you have a—half the audience, here. 

STATEMENT OF VICE ADMIRAL THOMAS J. BARRETT, 
USCG (RET.), NOMINEE TO BE DEPUTY SECRETARY, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  so  much.  I’d  be  de-
lighted  to  introduce  my  wife,  Sheila,  and  also,  frankly,  thank  her 
for  her  support  over  the  years  to  me,  personally,  to  our  family— 
we  have  four  terrific  kids,  Tom,  who  is  here,  Matt,  Becky,  and 
Paul—and  her  service  to  our  country.  Both  Tom,  who  is  a  Major 
in  the  United  States  Army—I’m  extraordinarily  proud  of,  and  his 
wife,  Jill—and  our  youngest  son,  Paul—are  combat  veterans  from 
Iraq.  And  our  other  two  kids  are  terrific.  But  Sheila  has  been  in-
strumental  in  forging  that  family  and  that  commitment.  And  I 
thank you for the opportunity to acknowledge them, sir. 

The CHAIRMAN. Please rise. 
[Applause.] 
The CHAIRMAN. Admiral, it’s yours, now. 
Admiral BARRETT. Mr. Chairman, good morning, again. 
I am deeply honored, and welcome the opportunity to appear be-
fore you today with these other distinguished nominees as you con-
sider  my  nomination  to  serve  as  Deputy  Secretary  of  the  United 
States Department of Transportation. 

I’m honored to have been nominated by the President for this im-
portant  responsibility,  and,  if  confirmed,  I  look  forward  to  ener-
getically  supporting  Secretary  Peters  and  our  leadership  team  at 
the Department. And I commit to you that I will fully dedicate my-
self  to  ensuring  the  Department  meets  its  vital  obligations  to  the 
American public and continuing to work closely with you, the Com-
mittee, and your staff. 

Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  indicated  earlier,  the  Department  of 
Transportation plays a vital role for our Nation. Along with its op-
erating  modes,  it  administers  comprehensive  nationwide  programs 
to  protect  our  citizens  and  communities  from  risks  to  life,  health, 
property,  and  the  environment  that  are  inherent  in  all  modes  of 
transportation.  Department  programs  help  develop,  sustain,  and 
maintain  the  air,  surface,  and  maritime  transportation  systems 
that are a foundation of Americans’ personal freedom and commer-
cial mobility. 

And,  as  you  indicated,  America’s  economic  vitality,  its  continued 
economic growth and ability to compete in a global economy depend 
upon dynamic and reliable transportation systems. 

Secretary  Peters  has  focused  the  Department  on  safety,  on  im-
proving  transportation  systems  performance,  including  reducing 
congestion,  and  on  bringing  forward  21st  century  solutions  to  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

6 

transportation challenges we face. And, if confirmed, I look forward 
to advancing these priorities. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  believe  my  experience  as  Administrator  of  the 
Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Material  Safety  Administration,  as  Chief 
Operating  Officer  of  the  Potomac  Institute  for  Policy  Studies,  and 
my  35  years  of  experience  in  the  Coast  Guard  in  a  broad  range  of 
assignments  has  provided  me  the  management,  leadership,  and 
teamwork  skills  to  succeed  in  the  position  for  which  I  have  been 
nominated.  The  experience  has  given  me  an  excellent  perspective 
on  how  organizations  and  their  personnel  work,  how  to  maintain 
focus  on  mission  objectives  and  achieve  the  performance  that  the 
administration, the Congress, you, and the public expects. 

My experiences have forged a bedrock commitment to safety, like 
yours, Mr. Chairman, and I appreciate your leadership in this area 
in the times I’ve appeared before you. 

I  drive  to  constantly  improve  organizational  performance,  and  a 
commitment  to  never  ignore  the  people  who  carry  out  the  Depart-
ment’s  missions  from  the  front  lines.  I  fully  appreciate  the  value 
of partnering with other Federal agencies, states, stakeholders, the 
public,  and  the  Congress  to  build  effective  enterprise  solutions  to 
transportation  challenges.  I  also  understand  and  appreciate  the 
need  to  work  closely  with  the  Department’s  Chief  Budget  Officer, 
the  Inspector  General,  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget,  and 
the  Government  Accountability  Office  to  ensure  the  Department’s 
programs are managed effectively and with efficiency. 

As Acting Deputy Secretary since March, I have also had the op-
portunity  to  closely  observe  and  develop  hands-on  experience  on 
major policy and management issues facing the Department. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  reiterate  my  commitment  to  you  that,  if  con-
firmed,  I  will  work,  each  and  every  day,  as  hard  as  I  possibly  can 
to  effectively  carry  out  the  duties  entrusted  to  me  and  to  the  De-
partment. 

Thank  you  very  much,  sir,  and  I’m  pleased  to  respond  to  any 

questions you may have. 

ral Barrett follow:] 

[The  prepared  statement  and  biographical  information  of  Admi-

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ADMIRAL THOMAS BARRETT, NOMINEE TO BE DEPUTY 

SECRETARY, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr. Chairman, Mr. Vice Chairman, and other distinguished Members of the Com-
mittee, I am honored and welcome the opportunity to appear before you today with 
these other distinguished nominees as you consider my nomination to serve as Dep-
uty  Secretary  of  the  United  States  Department  of  Transportation.  I  am  honored  to 
have  been  nominated  by  the  President  for  this  important  responsibility  and,  if  con-
firmed,  I  look  forward  to  energetically  supporting  Secretary  Mary  Peters  and  her 
leadership team at the Department. I commit to you that I will fully dedicate myself 
to helping ensure the Department meets its vital obligations to the American public, 
and continuing to work closely with you, the Committee and your staff. 

Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  know,  the  Department  of  Transportation  plays  a  vital  role 
for our Nation. The Department and its operating modes administer comprehensive, 
nationwide  programs  to  protect  our  citizens  and  communities  from  risks  to  life, 
health,  property  and  the  environment  inherent  in  all  modes  of  transportation.  De-
partmental programs help develop, sustain and maintain the air, surface and mari-
time  transportation  systems  that  are  a  foundation  of  American  personal  freedom 
and  commercial  mobility.  We  all  know  America’s  economic  vitality,  continued  eco-
nomic growth and ability to compete in a global economy depend upon dynamic and 
reliable  transportation  systems.  Secretary  Peters  has  focused  the  Department  on 
safety,  improving  transportation  systems  performance  including  reducing  conges-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

7 

tion,  and  bringing  forward  21st  century  solutions  to  transportation  challenges.  If 
confirmed, I look forward to advancing these priorities. 

I believe my experience as the Administrator of the Pipelines and Hazardous Ma-
terials  Safety  Administration,  as  the  Chief  Operating  Officer  of  the  Potomac  Insti-
tute  for  Policy  Studies,  and  35  years  of  experience  in  the  Coast  Guard  in  a  broad 
range  of  assignments  has  provided  me  the  management,  leadership  and  teamwork 
skills  to  succeed  in  the  position  for  which  I  have  been  nominated.  This  experience 
has  given  me  an  excellent  perspective  on  how  organizations  and  their  personnel 
work,  how  to  ensure  and  maintain  focus  on  mission  objectives  and  achieve  the  per-
formance  that  the  Administration,  the  Congress  and  the  public  expects.  My  experi-
ence has forged a bedrock commitment to safety, a drive to constantly improve orga-
nizational performance, and a commitment to never ignore the circumstances of the 
people  who  carry  out  Department  missions  from  the  front  lines.  I  fully  appreciate 
the value of partnering with other Federal agencies, states, stakeholders, the public 
and the Congress to build effective enterprise solutions to transportation challenges. 
I also understand the need to work closely with the Department’s Chief Budget Offi-
cer,  the  Inspector  General,  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  and  the  Govern-
ment Accountability Office to ensure the Department’s programs are managed effec-
tively  and  with  efficiency.  As  Acting  Deputy  Secretary  of  Transportation  since 
March, I have also had the opportunity to closely observe and develop hands-on ex-
perience on the major policy and management issues facing the Department. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  reiterate  my  commitment  to  you  that,  if  confirmed,  I  will  work 
each  and  every  day  as  hard  as  I  possibly  can  to  effectively  carry  out  the  duties  en-
trusted to me and to the Department. 

I thank you and am pleased to respond to any questions you may have. 

A. BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION 

1. Name (Include any former names or nicknames used): Barrett, Thomas J., Vice 

Admiral, U.S. Coast Guard, (Retired). 

2.  Position  to  which  nominated:  Deputy  Secretary,  United  States  Department  of 

Transportation. 

3. Date of Nomination: June 11, 2007. 
4. Address (List current place of residence and office addresses): 

Residence: Information not released to the public. 
Office: 1200 New Jersey Ave., SE, Washington, DC 20590. 
5. Date and Place of Birth: January 15, 1947; New York, NY. 
6.  Provide  the  name,  position,  and  place  of  employment  for  your  spouse  (if  mar-
ried)  and  the  names  and  ages  of  your  children  (including  stepchildren  and  children 
by a previous marriage). 

Spouse:  Sheila  M.  Barrett,  Docent/Executive  Assistant,  Women  in  Military 
Service to America Memorial. 
Children:  (Major)  Thomas  J.  Barrett,  34;  Matthew  D.  Barrett,  32;  Rebecca  S. 
(Barrett) Cooney, 29; Paul P. Barrett, 24. 

7. List all college and graduate degrees. Provide year and school attended. 

B.S., LeMoyne College, Syracuse, NY, 1968. 
Juris  Doctor  (with  honors),  George  Washington  University,  Washington,  DC, 
1976. 

8.  List  all  post-graduate  employment,  and  highlight  all  management-level  jobs 
held and any non-managerial jobs that relate to the position for which you are nomi-
nated. 

Post-graduate Employment: 

Scandinavian Airlines System, Kennedy Airport, NY, summer 1969. 
United States Coast Guard, 1969–2004. 
Potomac Institute for Policy Studies, 2005–2006. 
United States Department of Transportation, 2006–present. 

Management Level Jobs Held: 

Acting Deputy Secretary, U.S. DOT. 
Administrator,  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration,  U.S. 
DOT. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

8 

Vice  President  and  Chief  Operating  Officer,  Potomac  Institute  for  Policy  Stud-
ies. 
Vice Commandant, United States Coast Guard. 
Commander, Seventeenth Coast Guard District and Naval Forces Alaska. 
Director, Reserve and Training, United States Coast Guard. 
Commanding  Officer,  Support  Center  Kodiak  Alaska,  United  States  Coast 
Guard. 
Chief, Legal Programs and Policy, United Stated Coast Guard. 
Deputy  Commander,  Maintenance  and  Logistics  Command,  Atlantic,  United 
States Coast Guard. 
Deputy Chief, Personnel and Training, United States Coast Guard. 
Executive Officer, USCG Base/Support Center, Kodiak, Alaska. 
District  Legal  Officer,  Seventeenth  Coast  Guard  District,  United  States  Coast 
Guard. 

Other Related Jobs: 

Outer  Continental  Shelf  Safety  Staff,  Office  of  Marine  Safety  and  Environ-
mental Protection, United States Coast Guard. 
Claims and Litigation Staff, Office of Chief Counsel, United States Coast Guard 
Deck Officer, USCGC CHASE. 

9. Attach a copy of your resume. A copy of my resume is attached. 
10.  List  any  advisory,  consultative,  honorary  or  other  part-time  service  or  posi-
tions with Federal, State, or local governments, other than those listed above, with-
in the last 5 years: None. 

11.  List  all  positions  held  as  an  officer,  director,  trustee,  partner,  proprietor, 
agent, representative, or consultant of any corporation, company, firm, partnership, 
or  other  business,  enterprise,  educational  or  other  institution  within  the  last  5 
years. 

Vice  President  and  Chief  Operating  Officer,  Potomac  Institute  for  Policy  Stud-
ies. 
Director, National Capital Chapter, Navy League of the United States. 

12.  Please  list  each  membership  you  have  had  during  the  past  10  years  or  cur-
rently hold with any civic, social, charitable, educational, political, professional, fra-
ternal, benevolent or religious organization, private club, or other membership orga-
nization. Include dates of membership and any positions you have held with any or-
ganization. Please note whether any such club or organization restricts membership 
on the basis of sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age or handicap. 

Memberships 

District of Columbia Bar, 1976–present. 
Reserve Officers Association, 1997–present. 
Navy League of the United States, 2004–present. 
Veterans of Foreign Wars of the United States, 1999–present. 
Coast Guard Combat Veterans Association, 2003–present. 
U.S. Naval Institute, 1976–present. 
Army War College Alumni Association, 1989–present. 
Juneau Alaska Downtown Rotary Association, 1999–2002. 
Alaska State Chamber of Commerce, Coast Guard Liaison, 2001–2002. 
North  Pacific  Fisheries  Management  Council  (non-voting  member),  1999–2002. 
Navy Enlisted Reserve Association, 1997–1999. 
U.S. Coast Guard Academy Board of Trustees, 1997–1999. 
None of these organizations restricts membership on the basis of sex, race, reli-
gion, national origin, age or handicap. 

13.  Have  you  ever  been  a  candidate  for  public  office?  If  so,  indicate  whether  any 
campaign  has  any  outstanding  debt,  the  amount,  and  whether  you  are  personally 
liable for that debt: I have never been a candidate for public office. 

14.  Itemize  all  political  contributions  to  any  individual,  campaign  organization, 
political  party,  political  action  committee,  or  similar  entity  of  $500  or  more  for  the 
past 10 years: None. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

9 

15. List all scholarships, fellowships, honorary degrees, honorary society member-
ships,  military  medals  and  any  other  special  recognition  for  outstanding  service  or 
achievements. 

Military Awards 

Coast Guard Distinguished Service Medal. 
Legion of Merit (5 awards). 
Coast Guard Meritorious Service Medal. 
Coast Guard Commendation Medal (2 awards). 
Coast Guard Achievement Medal. 
National Defense Service Medal (with 2 bronze stars). 
Humanitarian Service Medal. 
Vietnam Service Medal (with 2 bronze stars). 
Republic of Vietnam Campaign Medal. 
Secretary of Transportation 9/11 Medal. 
Secretary of Defense Service Badge. 
Commandant of the Coast Guard Staff Service Badge. 
Command Ashore Badge. 
Foreign Awards from the Republic of Georgia, Argentina, and Malta. 

Civic Awards 

Citations for Service—18th Alaska Legislature; 22nd Alaska Legislature. 
Commendation—Kodiak Island Borough. 
Commendation—Kodiak Island Borough School District. 
Veterans of Foreign Wars of the United States Exceptional Service Award. 
Special Olympics—Special Friend Award. 

Scholarships 

New York State Regents College Scholarship. 
Teamsters College Scholarship. 

16.  Please  list  each  book,  article,  column,  or  publication  you  have  authored,  indi-
vidually  or  with  others,  and  any  speeches  that  you  have  given  on  topics  relevant 
to  the  position  for  which  you  have  been  nominated.  Do  not  attach  copies  of  these 
publications unless otherwise instructed. 

Articles 

The Guardian, Challenges and the Road Ahead (Commercial Vehicle Safety Alli-
ance), Second Quarter 2007. 
American  Gas,  April  2007,  Enterprise  Approach  to  Pipeline  Safety  and  Reli-
ability. 
PHMSA Focus Administrator’s Column (Quarterly). 
Deepwater  Methods  to  Reduce  Systems  of  Systems  Risks  (IEEE  SMC  2005  Con-
ference). 
Defending Ports (National Defense, May 2004). 
Naval Forces Magazine, One Team One Fight, Issue # 4/03. 
Coast Guard Oral History Project—Attack on America, September 11, 2001. 
Coast Guard Reservist Magazine—From the Bridge Columns, Tri-Monthly 1997– 
1999. 
Federal Maritime Commission Jurisdiction, George Washington University Law 
Review Notes, 1976. 

Remarks  relevant  to  the  position  for  which  nominated  while  at  the  Department 

of Transportation: 

Department of Transportation Telework Forum. 
Topic: Expanding Telework in the Department of Transportation. 
June 18, 2007. 
Washington, D.C. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

10 

Department of Transportation’s Asian Pacific Islander Month Celebration. 
Topic: Contributions of Asian Pacific Americans to the Department of Transpor-
tation and the United States. 
May 16, 2007. 
Washington, D.C. 
Bear Stearns Global Transportation Conference. 
Topic: Intersection of Transportation and the Economy. 
May 9, 2007. 
New York, NY. 
American  International  Automobile  Dealers  Association  (AIADA)  and  the  Asso-
ciation  of  International  Automobile  Manufacturers  (AIAM)  International  Auto 
Summit. 
Topic: Importance of a Safe and Efficient Transportation System in America. 
May 8, 2007. 
Washington, D.C. 
Common Ground Alliance Congressional Reception. 
Topic: Remarks on the Nationwide Campaign ‘‘Call 811—Before You Dig’’. 
April 30, 2007. 
Washington, D.C. 
Council on Safe Transportation of Hazardous Materials Annual Meeting. 
Topic: Keynote Remarks on Transportation of Hazardous Materials. 
April 24, 2007. 
Scottsdale, AZ. 
American Petroleum Institute Annual Pipeline Conference. 
Topic: Keynote Remarks on Pipeline Safety Leadership, Transparency, and En-
ergy Reliability. 
April 18, 2007. 
Albuquerque, NM. 
Regional  Emergency  Transportation  Coordinators  &  Representatives  Annual 
Conference. 
Topic: Secretary’s Response Goals for the Year to Come. 
April 11, 2007. 
Via Teleconference from Washington, D.C. 
Combined Federal Campaign Closing Ceremony. 
Topic:  Thanks  to  DOT  employees  who  supported  the  Combined  Federal  Cam-
paign. 
April 5, 2007. 
Washington, D.C. 
Keynote Address at the Motor Carrier Safety Association Conference. 
Topic: Importance of Safe and Efficient Transportation Systems in America. 
March 26, 2007. 
Atlanta, GA. 
Chlorine Institute’s Annual Meeting. 
Topic: Keynote Remarks on Risk Management. 
March 20, 2007. 
Houston, TX. 
Compressed Gas Association Annual Meeting. 
Topic: Keynote Remarks on Risk Management. 
March 19, 2007. 
St. Petersburg, FL. 
Common Ground Alliance Annual Meeting. 
Topic: Enterprise Approach to Reducing Significant Safety Risk. 
March 7, 2007. 
Orlando, FL. 
American Gas Association Annual Board Meeting. 
Topic: Keynote Address on Partnerships, Energy Reliability, Transparency, and 
Leadership. 
February 19, 2007. 
Washington, D.C. 
Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration Research and Develop-
ment Public Conference. 
Topic: The Importance of Investing in R&D to Safe Energy Infrastructure. 
February 7, 2007. 
New Orleans, LA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

11 

Interstate Natural Gas Association of America Annual Board Meeting. 
Topic:  Keynote  Remarks  on  System  Risk  Management,  Partnerships,  Trans-
parency, Energy Reliability, and Leadership. 
January 25–26, 2007. 
Houston, TX. 
Cooperative  Hazardous  Materials  Enforcement  and  Development  Annual  Meet-
ing. 
Topic:  Keynote  Remarks  on  System  Risk  Management,  Partnerships,  Trans-
parency, and Leadership. 
January 23, 2007. 
Salt Lake City, UT. 
Association of Oil Pipe Lines/American Petroleum Institute’s Winter Meeting. 
Topic:  Importance  of  Data  Driven  System  Risk  Management,  Leadership, 
Transparency, and Energy Reliability. 
November 30, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 
Dangerous Goods Advisory Council Annual Meeting. 
Topic:  Keynote  Address  on  System  Risk  Management,  Partnerships,  Trans-
parency, and Leadership. 
November 16, 2006. 
Crystal City, VA. 
Pipeline Safety Trust Annual Meeting. 
Topic:  Keynote  Address  on  Enforcement  Transparency  and  Public/Community 
Involvement in Safety Issues. 
November 3, 2006. 
New Orleans, LA. 
National Association of State Pipeline Safety Representatives. 
Topic:  Keynote  Address  on  State  Partnerships,  Enforcement  Transparency,  En-
ergy Reliability, and Leadership. 
November 2, 2006. 
Little Rock, AK. 
Emergency Preparedness Grant Announcement for First Responders. 
Topic: Grant Announcement. 
October 26, 2006. 
Houston, TX. 
Emergency Preparedness Grant Announcement for First Responders. 
Topic: Grant Announcement. 
October 25, 2006. 
Monroe, LA. 
Emergency Preparedness Grant Announcement for First Responders. 
Topic: Grant Announcement. 
October 19, 2006. 
Oakland, CA. 
Arizona Emergency Response Commission Annual Meeting. 
Topic:  Keynote  Remarks  on  Emergency  Response  Readiness,  Training,  and  the 
Value of Partnerships. 
October 17, 2006. 
Casa Grande, AZ. 
Emergency Preparedness Grant Announcement for First Responders. 
Topic: Grant Announcement. 
October 17, 2006. 
Phoenix, AZ. 
Listening Session with Alaska Congressional Delegation. 
Topic: PHMSA Actions to Oversee BP Performance. 
October 13, 2006. 
Anchorage, AK. 
Emergency Preparedness Grant Announcement for First Responders. 
Topic: Grant Announcement. 
October 12, 2006. 
Bellevue, WA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

12 

International  Vessel  Operators  Hazardous  Materials  Association  Annual  Meet-
ing. 
Topic: Keynote Remarks on the Importance of System Risk Management, Part-
nerships for Safety Results, Transparency, and Leadership. 
October 11, 2006. 
Long Beach, CA. 
American Steel Factory. 
Topic: Jobs and Our Economy, Pipeline Manufacturing Quality Assurance. 
October 10, 2006. 
Birmingham, AL. 
Emergency Preparedness Grant Announcement for First Responders. 
Topic: Grant Announcement. 
October 9, 2006. 
Philadelphia, PA. 
Chamber of Commerce Annual Meeting. 
Topic: Keynote Address on BP Pipeline Oversight. 
October 7, 2006. 
Kodiak, AK. 
Emergency Preparedness Grant Announcement for First Responders. 
Topic: Grant Announcement. 
October 4, 2006. 
Pittsburgh, PA. 
National Association of State Fire Marshals. 
Topic:  ‘‘Prevention  through  People’’,  Systems  Risk  Management,  Partnerships, 
and Leadership. 
October 3, 2006. 
College Station, TX. 
American Pyrotechnics Association Annual Meeting. 
Topic:  Keynote  Remarks  on  Risk  Management  and  Enforcement  Transparency. 
September 16, 2006. 
Nashville, TN. 
Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration  Annual  Enforcement 
Meeting. 
Topic: Remarks on Data Driven, System Risk Management, Inspection, and En-
forcement; Resource Allocation. 
September 13, 2006. 
Solomons Island, MD. 
National Association of State Fire Marshals Annual Meeting. 
Topic: Brief Remarks, Awards. 
August 12, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 
Interested Parties on Hazardous Materials Transportation. 
Topic:  Safety  Issues  Pertaining  to  the  Transportation  of  Hazardous  Materials. 
July 26, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 
Pipeline Safety Trust Board/Family Members of Bellingham Accident. 
Topic:  Thanks  for  Work  to  Advance  Pipeline  Safety  and  PHMSA  Commitment 
to Safe Operations. 
July 6, 2006. 
Bellingham, WA. 
Department  of  Transportation’s  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Ad-
ministration’s Technical Standards Committee. 
Topic: PHMSA’s Role in Promoting the Safe Transportation of Hazardous Mate-
rials. 
June 28, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 
Department of Veterans Affairs. 
Topic:  Award  Acceptance,  Speech  at  their  5th  Annual  Champions  of  Veterans 
Enterprise Program. 
June 14, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

13 

Remarks while at Potomac Institute for Policy Studies: 

Panelist 
Topic: Stun Guns—Safety of Use. 
Potomac Institute for Policy Studies Workshop. 
February 23–24 2005. 
Arlington, VA. 
Panelist 
Topic: Role of the Military in Combating Terrorism. 
Potomac Institute for Policy Studies Workshop. 
May 17, 2005. 
Arlington, VA. 
Coast Guard Innovation Conference. 
Topic: The New Security Environment. 
May 4, 2005. 
San Jose, CA. 
34th Institute for Foreign Policy Analysis and Fletcher School Conference. 
Topic: Security Planning and Military Transformation after Iraqi Freedom. 
December 4, 2003. 
Washington, D.C. 

I  spoke  regularly  on  service-related  issues  and  priorities  while  Coast  Guard  Vice 
Commandant, Coast Guard Commander in Alaska and Director of Coast Guard Di-
rector of Reserve and Training in multiple public forums. Audiences included Coast 
Guard  personnel,  stakeholders,  civic  organizations,  and  the  general  public.  I  do  not 
have records reflecting these events. 

17.  Please  identify  each  instance  in  which  you  have  testified  orally  or  in  writing 
before  Congress  in  a  governmental  or  non-governmental  capacity  and  specify  the 
date and subject matter of each testimony. 

(All appearances were in a governmental capacity) 

House Appropriations Committee. 
Topic: Hearing on Surface Transportation Safety and PHMSA FY 08 Budget Re-
quest. 
March 29, 2007. 
Washington, D.C. 
Senate Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee. 
Topic: Hearing on Hazardous Materials Rail Security. 
January 18, 2007. 
Washington, D.C. 
Senate Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee. 
Topic: Hearing on the Pipeline Safety Reauthorization. 
November 16, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 
House Committee on Transportation and Infrastructure. 
Topic: Hearing on the Oversight of BP Prudhoe Bay Pipelines. 
September 13, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 
Senate Committee on Energy and Natural Resources. 
Topic: Hearing on the Oversight of BP Pipelines. 
September 12, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 
House Committee on Energy and Commerce. 
Topic: Oversight and Investigations of the BP Prudhoe Bay Pipelines. 
September 7, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 
House Energy and Commerce Committee. 
Topic:  Oversight  Hearing  on  Discussion  Draft  of  the  Pipeline  Safety  and  Reli-
ability Act of 2006. 
July 27, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 
House Committee on Government Reform. 
Topic: Government/Industry Preparedness for 2006 Hurricane Season. 
June 2, 2006. 
Washington, D.C. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

14 

House Subcommittee on Coast Guard and Marine Transportation. 
Topic: Coast Guard Integrated Deepwater System. 
April 26, 2004. 
Washington, D.C. 
Subcommittee on Oceans and Fisheries. 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation. 
Topic: Magnuson-Stevens Fisheries Conservation and Management Act. 
June 18, 2000. 
Anchorage, AK. 

18.  Given  the  current  mission,  major  programs,  and  major  operational  objectives 
of  the  department/agency  to  which  you  have  been  nominated,  what  in  your  back-
ground  or  employment  experience  do  you  believe  affirmatively  qualifies  you  for  ap-
pointment to the position for which you have been nominated, and why do you wish 
to serve in that position? 

From  my  service  in  the  United  States  Coast  Guard,  work  at  Potomac  Institute, 
and  most  recently  as  the  first  Administrator  of  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Mate-
rials  Safety  Administration  (PHMSA),  I  gained  broad  experience  at  both  the  oper-
ational  and  policy  level  related  to  transportation,  transportation  safety,  transpor-
tation security, environmental protection, systems risk management, strategic plan-
ning, program budget planning and execution, public communication, and outreach. 
I  understand  and  appreciate  the  value  of  partnering  with  other  Federal  agencies, 
states, stakeholders, the public, and the Congress to build effective enterprise solu-
tions to transportation challenges. I understand the need and processes for effective 
and transparent Federal oversight and enforcement of Federal laws and regulations, 
the  need  to  exercise  fiscal  discipline  in  Federal  programs,  the  importance  of  sound 
performance measures, and the need for close attention to the capabilities, develop-
ment,  and  performance  of  the  Federal  employees  who  carry  out  the  Department 
missions on a daily basis. 

If  confirmed  by  the  Senate,  I  strongly  desire  to  serve  as  Deputy  Secretary  of 
Transportation because I truly believe the Department’s missions are crucial to the 
safety,  mobility  and  well-being  of  the  American  public  and  critical  to  continued 
growth  of  the  American  economy.  I  believe  I  have  the  requisite  skills,  experience 
and  determination  to  affect  a  strong  positive  influence  on  Department  mission  out-
comes.  I  am  also  energized  by  the  leadership  of  Secretary  of  Transportation  Mary 
Peters and desire to help advance her priorities for the Department. 

19. What do you believe are your responsibilities, if confirmed, to ensure that the 
department/agency  has  proper  management  and  accounting  controls,  and  what  ex-
perience do you have in managing a large organization? 

If  confirmed,  I  believe  the  Deputy  Secretary  is  obligated  to  work  closely  with  the 
Assistant  Secretary  for  Budget  (the  CFO),  the  modal  administrators,  and  in  step 
with  the  recommendations  of  the  Inspector  General  of  the  Department,  the  Office 
of  Management  and  Budget,  and  the  Government  Accountability  Office  to  ensure 
that  Departmental  programs  have  appropriate  management  and  accounting  con-
trols,  which  are  properly  adhered  to.  Further,  I  believe  that  if  gaps  are  uncovered, 
it is the responsibility of the Deputy Secretary to direct suitable and timely actions 
to  correct  any  problems.  My  experience  includes  direct  management  responsibility 
for  Federal  program  planning,  budgeting,  execution,  oversight,  and  personnel  lead-
ership at multiple levels, including significant operational and program oversight re-
sponsibilities  for  a  46,000-person  Federal  agency  with  a  $6.5  billion  budget  as  the 
Coast  Guard  Vice  Commandant.  As  Administrator  for  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous 
Materials Safety Administration since June 2006, and most recently as Acting Dep-
uty  Secretary  of  Transportation,  I  have  also  had  the  opportunity  to  closely  observe 
and  directly  support  the  priorities  of  former  Secretary  Norman  Mineta  and  Sec-
retary Mary Peters and gain further hands-on experience on the current major pol-
icy and management issues facing the Department of Transportation. 

20.  What  do  you  believe  to  be  the  top  three  challenges  facing  the  department/ 

The  following  describes  what  I  believe  to  be  the  top  three  challenges  facing  the 

agency, and why? 

Department of Transportation: 

1. Improving transportation safety is an abiding Department responsibility, the 
Department’s highest priority and greatest challenge. Safe travel is the expecta-
tion  of  the  public,  and  the  consequences  of  failure  are  tragic  for  individuals, 
families, and our communities. Despite steady safety progress in many areas of 
transportation, more remains to be done, and safety issues demand unrelenting 
attention. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

15 

2.  Improving  transportation  systems  performance.  The  ability  of  U.S.  transpor-
tation  systems  to  move  products  and  people  efficiently  is  vital  to  our  security, 
economy,  and  ability  to  compete  effectively  in  a  global  marketplace.  It  under-
pins our individual freedom to live and work where and how as we choose. Our 
current transportation systems are strained to capacity, challenged by aging in-
frastructure,  and  hobbled  by  outdated  policies  and  technology.  We  need  to  im-
prove how we build, sustain, and grow this crucial national capability, bringing 
new approaches and 21st century solutions to bear. 
3. Ensuring the high quality performance of the Federal DOT workforce. Simply 
put,  our  strength  is  in  the  performance  of  our  people;  the  DOT  workforce  is 
aging,  and  recruiting  and  retention  of  qualified  personnel,  especially  in  tech-
nical and engineering areas is an increasing challenge. We need to successfully 
position this workforce to meet future Federal transportation requirements. 

B. POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 

1.  Describe  all  financial  arrangements,  deferred  compensation  agreements,  and 

other continuing dealings with business associates, clients, or customers. 

I have a 403(b) retirement plan funded while I was working at Potomac Institute. 
I have severed my employment and business association with Potomac Institute and 
Potomac  Institute  no  longer  makes  any  contributions  to  the  plan.  I  have  no  other 
financial or deferred compensation arrangements. 

2.  Do  you  have  any  commitments  or  agreements,  formal  or  informal,  to  maintain 
employment, affiliation or practice with any business, association or other organiza-
tion during your appointment? If so, please explain. 

I have no such commitments or agreements. 
3.  Indicate  any  investments,  obligations,  liabilities,  or  other  relationships  which 
could  involve  potential  conflicts  of  interest  in  the  position  to  which  you  have  been 
nominated. 

None  other  than  common  stock  in  Nationwide  Financial  Services,  referred  to  in 

the attached Deputy General Counsel opinion letter. 

4.  Describe  any  business  relationship,  dealing,  or  financial  transaction  which  you 
have had during the last 5 years, whether for yourself, on behalf of a client, or act-
ing  as  an  agent,  that  could  in  any  way  constitute  or  result  in  a  possible  conflict  of 
interest in the position to which you have been nominated: None. 

5. Describe any activity during the past 10 years in which you have been engaged 
for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the passage, defeat, or modifica-
tion of any legislation or affecting the administration and execution of law or public 
policy. 

None  other  than  official  duties  with  the  Coast  Guard  and  the  Department  of 

Transportation related to the execution of U.S. laws and policies. 

6.  Explain  how  you  will  resolve  any  potential  conflict  of  interest,  including  any 

that may be disclosed by your responses to the above items. 

In accordance with the attached letter of the Deputy General Counsel. 

C. LEGAL MATTERS 

1.  Have  you  ever  been  disciplined  or  cited  for  a  breach  of  ethics  by,  or  been  the 
subject of a complaint to any court, administrative agency, professional association, 
disciplinary committee, or other professional group? If so, please explain. No. 

2.  Have  you  ever  been  investigated,  arrested,  charged,  or  held  by  any  Federal, 
State,  or  other  law  enforcement  authority  of  any  Federal,  State,  county,  or  munic-
ipal entity, other than for a minor traffic offense? If so, please explain. No. 

3.  Have  you  or  any  business  of  which  you  are  or  were  an  officer  ever  been  in-
volved  as  a  party  in  an  administrative  agency  proceeding  or  civil  litigation?  If  so, 
please explain. No. 

4.  Have  you  ever  been  convicted  (including  pleas  of  guilty  or  nolo  contendere)  of 
any  criminal  violation  other  than  a  minor  traffic  offense?  If  so,  please  explain.  No. 
5.  Please  advise  the  Committee  of  any  additional  information,  favorable  or  unfa-
vorable,  which  you  feel  should  be  disclosed  in  connection  with  your  nomination: 
None. 

6.  Have  you  ever  been  accused,  formally  or  informally,  of  sexual  harassment  or 
discrimination  on  the  basis  of  sex,  race,  religion  or  any  other  basis?  If  so,  please 
explain. 

While  serving  as  the  Commanding  Officer  of  the  Coast  Guard  Support  Center  at 
Kodiak, Alaska, I was accused (informally) by a petty officer of harassment because 
I ordered her to see a Coast Guard physician to evaluate whether she was suicidal. 
At the time, I had reason to believe she might have been. The complaint was infor-
mally investigated and dismissed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

16 

D. RELATIONSHIP WITH COMMITTEE 

1. Will you ensure that your department/agency complies with deadlines for infor-

mation set by Congressional committees? Yes. 

2.  Will  you  ensure  that  your  department/agency  does  whatever  it  can  to  protect 
Congressional  witnesses  and  whistle  blowers  from  reprisal  for  their  testimony  and 
disclosures? Yes. 

3.  Will  you  cooperate  in  providing  the  Committee  with  requested  witnesses,  in-
cluding technical experts and career employees, with firsthand knowledge of matters 
of interest to the Committee? Yes. 

4.  Are  you  willing  to  appear  and  testify  before  any  duly  constituted  committee  of 
the  Congress  on  such  occasions  as  you  may  be  reasonably  requested  to  do  so?  Yes. 

RESUME OF THOMAS J. BARRETT, VICE ADMIRAL, USCG (RET.) 

Executive Summary 

Known for strengthening organizational values, clearly identifying strategic issues 
and  goals,  creating  stakeholder  partnerships,  applying  sound  operational  and  busi-
ness  practices.  fostering  teamwork  across  a  diverse  work  force,  and  ensuring  pro-
gram,  policy,  budget  and  communications  alignment.  Performance  characterized  by 
outcome focus, systems perspective, attention to people, and energetic execution. 
Professional Experience 

Acting  Deputy  Secretary,  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation,  March  2006  to 

present. 

Principal  Advisor  to  Secretary  of  Transportation.  Provide  oversight  and  direc-
tion  to  ensure  effectiveness  and  efficiency  of  Department  operating  programs. 
COO; responsible for day-to-day management of the Department’s $61.1 million 
budget,  10  modal  administrations,  and  60,000  employees.  Overseeing  move  of 
Department Headquarters to new SE Federal Center, increasing telecommuting 
by  Department  employees,  ensuring  Department  readiness  for  hurricanes  and 
other  disasters,  strengthening  Department’s  safety  initiatives,  and  identifying 
transportation  infrastructure  obstacles  to  expanding  alternate  energy  develop-
ment. 

Administrator, Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration, U.S. De-
partment  of  Transportation,  President  Appointed/Senate  Confirmed,  June  2005  to 
present. 

Agency  CEO.  Advises  the  Secretary  of  Transportation  on  all  matters  within 
Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration (PHMSA) jurisdiction. 
Directs national programs for reducing risks to life and property inherent in the 
transportation of hazardous materials in commerce and transportation of liquid, 
natural  gas,  petroleum,  and  other  hazardous  materials  by  pipeline.  Partnered 
with the Administration, Congress, and stakeholders to achieve reauthorization 
of  the  Pipeline  Safety  Act,  which  bolsters  state  excavation  damage  prevention 
programs.  the  largest  single  cause  of  pipeline  failures.  Launched  National  811 
‘‘Call Before You Dig’’ initiative with Common Ground Alliance. Increased over-
sight  of  British  Petroleum  and  key  national  energy  infrastructure  at  Prudhoe 
Bay,  Alaska,  following  pipeline  ruptures.  Worked  with  Congress  to  close  over-
sight gaps. Eliminated jurisdictional conflicts and improved system oversight by 
agreements  with  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  and  the  State  of 
Alaska  Department  of  Natural  Resources.  Increased  public  transparency  of 
agency enforcement programs and focused public attention on pipeline and haz-
ardous materials issues. 

Vice  President  and  Chief  Operating  Officer,  Potomac  Institute  for  Policy  Studies, 

January 2005–March 2006. 

Directed  business  activities,  participated  in  policy  studies  at  501(c)(3)  inde-
pendent policy institute focused on national science and technology, national se-
curity, and homeland security policy. Reduced operating costs, improved IT sup-
port,  and  contributed  to  studies  and  papers  related  to  combating  terrorism, 
microelectronics,  non-lethal  weapons,  improvised  explosive  devices,  system  of 
systems, and cyber defense. 

Vice Commandant, United States Coast Guard, 2002 to 2004. 

Second  in  Command  of  46,000  person,  $6.5  billion,  maritime  Armed  Force.  Di-
rected  Service  in  Commandant’s  absence.  Principal  policy  advisor  to  the  Com-
mandant.  Coordinated  Coast  Guard  Leadership  Council  which  issued  agency 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

17 

strategic  direction.  Agency  Acquisition  Executive.  Performance  instrumental  to 
Coast  Guard  success  with  post-9/11  increase  in  maritime  security  responsibil-
ities,  move  to  new  Department  of  Homeland  Security,  standup  of  Coast  Guard 
membership in the National Foreign Intelligence community and support to Op-
eration  Iraqi  Freedom,  while  sustaining  other  missions  including  counter-drug, 
migrant  interdiction,  environmental  protection,  living  resource  protection,  and 
search  and  rescue.  Agency  performance  metrics  positive  (e.g.,  lives  saved,  mi-
grants  interdicted,  illicit  drugs  seized).  As  Acting  Commandant,  directed  suc-
cessful response to December, 2003, heightened security evolution, Haitian gov-
ernment  collapse,  and  the  successful  repatriation  of  thousands  of  migrants  in 
difficult  circumstances  while  preventing  an  influx  of  refugees  into  South  Flor-
ida. 

Commander, Seventeenth Coast Guard District, United States Coast Guard, 1999 

to 2002. 

Directed Coast Guard operations in Alaska and the North Pacific. Commander, 
Naval Forces Alaska. Delivered Operational Excellence across all mission areas. 
Post-9/11,  devised  and  implemented  a  robust  maritime  security  program  to  de-
tect and deter terrorist threats that was fully integrated with Alaska Command, 
the  Department  of  Justice,  and  the  State  of  Alaska.  Accident-free  search  and 
rescue  program  with  675  lives  saved  in  over  2,200  cases.  Implemented 
proactive,  non-regulatory  safety  programs  (Ready  for  Sea)  to  reduce  risk. 
Partnered  with  state  and  Federal  agencies,  tanker  and  terminal  operators  to 
improve  system  risk  management  and  safety  of  petroleum  and  shipping  move-
ments  in  Prince  William  Sound/Port  of  Valdez.  Partnered  with  Federal  and 
state  agencies,  cruise  ship  industry,  interest  groups  and  concerned  citizens  to 
sustain cruise ship activity while reducing harmful discharges into Alaskan wa-
ters.  Led  protection  of  Alaskan  Fisheries  through  expanded  enforcement  to 
deter  illegal  high-seas  driftnet  fishing  and  maritime  boundary  incursions. 
Achieved the most foreign vessel seizures in 15 years and an 80 percent reduc-
tion  in  incursions.  Built  close  partnership  with  the  Russian  Federal  Border 
Service. To reduce safety risks, partnered with the State of Alaska to delay fish-
eries openings when storms forecast. 

Director of Reserve and Training, United Stated Coast Guard, 1997 to 1999. 

Directed  all  Coast  Guard  officer  and  enlisted  training  and  leadership  develop-
ment  programs.  Directed  Coast  Reserve.  Member,  Board  of  Trustees,  Coast 
Guard  Academy.  Expanded  use  of  performance  technology,  resulting  in  numer-
ous process improvements, including significant reduction in recruit attrition at 
boot  camp.  Oversaw  standup  of  new  Leadership  and  Development  Center  at 
Coast Guard Academy. Consolidated and aligned all Coast Guard officer and en-
listed  leadership  development  programs,  improved  personnel  conduct  and  per-
formance  across  the  agency,  and  restored  8,000  member  Reserve  to  authorized 
strength from 25 percent shortfall. 

Deputy Commander, Maintenance and Logistic Command, Atlantic, United States 

Coast Guard, 1996 to 1997. 

Instrumental  to  relocation  of  500-person  engineering  and  logistics  command 
from  Governors  Island,  NY  to  Norfolk,  VA.  Within  weeks  of  relocation,  despite 
staff  vacancies  of  up  to  50  percent  managed  successful  response  to  two  hurri-
canes, TWA 800 crash, and urgent need for expanded forward support bases for 
counter-drug  mission  in  Caribbean.  Expanded  use  of  performance  metrics.  Im-
proved  resource  visibility  helped  Command  meet  three-fold  increase  in  tem-
porary  personnel  demand  despite  reduced  pool  to  draw  from.  Increased  cutter 
availability by reducing unscheduled yard days. 

Deputy Chief, Personnel and Training, United States Coast Guard, 1994 to 1996. 
Realigned office to meet or exceed all performance goals with 24 percent reduc-
tion in staff. Revised agency personnel policies on fraternization and sexual har-
assment to better address increasing number of women service members. Intro-
duced  strategic  planning  to  office  by  in  depth  budget  analysis,  and  recouped 
$450,000 for reallocation to tier one objectives. 

Commanding  Officer,  Support  Center  Kodiak,  United  States  Coast  Guard,  1991 

to 1994. 

Developed  and  implemented  strategic  vision  and  initiatives  that  delivered  con-
sistent  ‘‘Rock  Solid’’  Support  by  Coast  Guard’s  largest/most  complex  base. 
Formed  environmental  partnerships  with  DOD,  Federal,  and  state  regulatory 
agencies to accelerate clean up of waste sites. Partnered with community to pro-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

18 

vide  elementary  school  on  base  during  renovation  of  community  school  build-
ings.  Established  multiple  cooperative  agreements  with  state  and  local  law  en-
forcement, fire departments, and medical services to conserve tax funds and im-
prove services. 

Special  Assistant  to  Chief  Counsel,  Chief  Legal  Programs  and  Policy,  United 

States Coast Guard, 1989 to 1991. 

Managed  all  senior  attorney  assignments  for  the  Chief  Counsel.  Rebalanced 
program assets to improve program legal services without additional resources. 
Overhauled  program  information  sharing  to  reduce  duplication  of  work.  Imple-
mented electronic and voice mail and conversion of research data to CD–ROMs, 
the first such use in the Coast Guard. 

Executive  Officer,  USCG  Base/Support  Center  Kodiak,  United  States  Coast 

Guard, 1985 to 1988. 

As  part  of  service-wide  initiative,  contracted  base  services,  reducing  costs  by 
over $2 million annually. Coordinated numerous CG/DOD exercises in Northern 
regions.  Instrumental  to  establishing  U.S.  Navy  Seal  training  facility  on  Ko-
diak. 

Principal  Assistant/District  Legal  Officer,  United  States  Coast  Guard,  1981  to 

1985. 

Provided  operational  and  program  support  legal  advice,  opinions,  and  guidance 
for  Coast  Guard  operations  in  Alaska.  Devised  process  to  adjudicate  seized  for-
eign  fishing  vessels  under  the  Magnuson  Fishery  Conservation  and  Manage-
ment  Act.  Aided  successful  prosecution  of  18  cases.  Identified  fraud  in  govern-
ment  construction  contract  and  pursued  contractor,  eliminating  over  $3  million 
in claims against the government. 

Office  of  Marine  Safety  and  Environmental  Protection,  United  States  Coast 

Guard, 1978 to 1981. 

Special  Project  Staff  for  Outer  Continental  Shelf  Safety  and  Implementation  of 
the Outer Continental Shelf Lands Act. 

Claims and Litigation Staff—Office of Chief Counsel, United States Coast Guard, 

1976 to 1978. 

Public  Affairs  Officer/Aide  to  the  District  Commander,  United  States  Coast 

Guard, 1971 to 1973. 

Deck Officer—USCGC CHASE (WHEC–718), United States Coast Guard, 1969 to 

1971. 

Vietnam Service 

Education 

J.D.  with  Honors,  1976,  George  Washington  University,  Washington,  D.C.,  Law 

Review; Coif. 

B.S., Biology, 1968, Lemoyne College Syracuse, NY. 
Capstone  Course  in  National  Security  Strategy  and  Military  Capabilities,  1996, 

National Defense University Washington, D.C. 

Military Strategic Studies, 1988–1989, Army War College, Carlisle, PA. 

Other 

Security Clearance—TS/SSBI (current). 
Member, District of Columbia Bar. 
Member, United States Naval Institute. 
Life Member, Veterans of Foreign Wars of the United States, Coast Guard Com-
bat Veterans Association. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Admiral. 
Our  next  nominee  is  Mr.  Paul  R.  Brubaker.  He  has  been  nomi-
nated  to  serve  as  Administrator  of  the  Research  and  Innovative 
Technology Administration of the Department of Transportation. 

Congratulations, and welcome, sir. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

STATEMENT OF PAUL R. BRUBAKER, NOMINEE TO BE 

19 

ADMINISTRATOR, RESEARCH AND INNOVATIVE TECHNOLOGY 
ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Mr. BRUBAKER. Thank you very much. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Would  you  care  to  introduce  your  family  be-

fore—— 

Mr. BRUBAKER. Yes, I’d love to—— 
The CHAIRMAN.—you proceed? 
Mr. BRUBAKER.—Mr. Chairman. 
My  lovely  wife,  Carolyn  here,  I’d  like  to  publicly  thank  her  for 
all the support she’s given me over my career. My little son, Gavin, 
who’s  4,  he’s  a  wonderful  little  boy.  And  my  mother-in-law,  Ruth 
Ann  Renford.  My  7-year-old,  who  suffers  from  autism,  is  actually 
out  playing  in  the  elevators  right  now,  which  he  finds  far  more 
thrilling than Daddy’s hearing, so—but I do want to publicly thank 
them for being supportive of me throughout my career. 

The CHAIRMAN. Please. 
[Applause.] 
The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Brubaker? 
Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Chairman  Inouye,  distinguished  Members  of  the 
Committee,  it  is  a  privilege  to  appear  before  you  today,  and  I  ap-
preciate your time and consideration. 

I  am  grateful  for  the  confidence  shown  in  me  by  the  President 
and Secretary Peters for nominating me for this important position. 
I would also like to thank Secretary Cohen for his kind remarks, 
as  well  as  what  I  affectionately  refer  to  as  ‘‘Team  Cohen,’’  who  is 
a group of former staffers and people who have been affiliated with 
Secretary  Cohen  over  the  years,  for  their  moral  support  to  me 
throughout my career. 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  constant  and  efficient  movement  of  people 
and goods across our country, and, indeed, around the globe, is cru-
cial  to  sustaining  our  global  economic  leadership  and  ensuring  the 
quality  of  life  for  all  Americans.  Yet,  the  increasing  demands 
placed on our transportation system to meet the needs of our grow-
ing  population,  changing  demographics,  and  logistical  demands  of 
commerce  are  placing  unprecedented  stress  on  our  system.  Over-
coming  these  challenges  will  increasingly  rely  on  the  development 
and deployment of new technologies and solutions. Because of this, 
the  Research  and  Innovative  Technology  Administration,  or  RITA, 
plays an increasingly important role coordinating the research and 
development activities across the Department in order to maximize 
the  benefit  of  our  multibillion-dollar  investment  in  transportation- 
related technologies. 

I believe my government experience at the GAO, the U.S. Senate, 
the Department of Defense, as well as my private-sector experience 
in  the  technology  industry,  will  serve  me  well,  should  I  be  con-
firmed as the next RITA Administrator. Over the past few decades, 
I’ve been exposed to the commercialization and application of many 
transformational  technologies  and  innovations.  And,  should  I  be 
confirmed, I look forward to working with the Department and the 
stakeholders  to  introduce  these  exciting  capabilities.  If  confirmed, 
I welcome the opportunity to work with the Committee to advance 
our transportation interests and maximize the benefits of transpor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

20 

tation-related  innovation  and  technology  to  improve  the  quality  of 
life for all Americans. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today,  and 

I welcome any questions the Committee may have. 

[The biographical information of Mr. Brubaker follows:] 

A. BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION AND QUALIFICATIONS 

1. Name (Include any former names or nicknames used): Paul Richard Brubaker. 
2.  Position  to  which  nominated:  Administrator,  Research  and  Innovative  Tech-

nology Administration, United States Department of Transportation. 

3. Date of Nomination: June 18, 2007. 
4. Address (List current place of residence and office addresses): 

Residence: Information not released to the public. 
Office: 12030 Sunrise Valley Drive, Suite 120, Reston, Virginia 20191. 

5. Date and Place of Birth: January 25, 1961; Youngstown, Ohio. 
6.  Provide  the  name,  position,  and  place  of  employment  for  your  spouse  (if  mar-
ried)  and  the  names  and  ages  of  your  children  (including  stepchildren  and  children 
by a previous marriage). 

Spouse:  Carolyn  Kay  Brubaker,  Business  Development,  Microsoft  Corporation. 
Children: Jackson Beil Brubaker, 7; Gavin Spencer Brubaker, 4. 

7. List all college and graduate degrees. Provide year and school attended. 

B.A., Youngstown State University, 1983. 
M.P.A., Kent State University, 1985. 

8.  List  all  post-undergraduate  employment,  and  highlight  all  management-level 
jobs held and any non-managerial jobs that relate to the position for which you are 
nominated. 

Post-graduate Employment: 

Program Manager, City of Stow, Ohio, 1984–1985. 
Broker, E.F. Hutton, 1985–1986. 
Evaluator and Senior Evaluator, U.S. General Accounting Office, 1987–1991. 
GAO Detail, Senate Appropriations Committee, 1990–1991. 
Staff  Investigator,  Senate  Subcommittee  on  Oversight  of  Government  Manage-
ment, Senate Committee on Governmental Affairs, 1992–1993. 

Management Level Jobs Held: 

Republican Staff Director, Deputy Staff Director, Senate Subcommittee on Over-
sight of Government Management, Senate Committee on Governmental Affairs, 
1993–1996. 
Vice  President,  Business  Development,  Federal  Data  Incorporated,  1996–1997. 
Vice President, Strategic Programs, Litton PRC, 1997–1999. 
Principal Director and Deputy Assistant Secretary of Defense (Deputy CIO), De-
partment of Defense, 1999–2001. 
President, Commerce One e-Government Solutions, 2001. 
CEO, Aquilent (formerly Commerce One e-Government Solutions Inc.), 2002. 
Founder and Partner, ICG Government, 2002–2003. 
Executive  Vice  President  and  Chief  Marketing  Officer,  SI  International,  2003– 
2006. 
CEO and Chairman of Board of Directors, Procentrix, 2006–present. 

9. Attach a copy of your resume. A copy is attached. 
10.  List  any  advisory,  consultative,  honorary,  or  other  part-time  service  or  posi-
tions with Federal, State, or local governments, other than those listed above, with-
in the last 5 years. 

Innovative Technology Authority (Center for Innovative Technology). 
Commonwealth of Virginia, Board Member (1998–2003), Chairman (2001–2003). 
11.  List  all  positions  held  as  an  officer,  director,  trustee,  partner,  proprietor, 
agent, representative, or consultant of any corporation, company, firm, partnership, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

21 

or  other  business,  enterprise,  educational,  or  other  institution  within  the  last  5 
years. 

CEO and Director, Aquilent. 
Founder and Partner, ICG Government. 
Executive Vice President, SI International. 
CEO and Chairman of Board of Directors, Procentrix. 
Sole  proprietor  for  condominium  in  Florida  (created  6/07),  PR  Brubaker  LLC. 
12.  Please  list  each  membership  you  have  had  during  the  past  10  years  or  cur-
rently hold with any civic, social, charitable, educational, political, professional, fra-
ternal, benevolent or religious organization, private club, or other membership orga-
nization. Include dates of membership and any positions you have held with any or-
ganization. Please note whether any such club or organization restricts membership 
on the basis of sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age, or handicap. 

Memberships: 

Armed  Forces  Communication  and  Electronics  Association  (AFCEA)  (1996– 
present). 

Chairman Emeritus, Technical Committee (present). 
Past President, DC Chapter (2006–present). 
Board of Directors DC Chapter (2001–present). 
Chairman, Technical Committee AFCEA International (2004–2006). 
Board Member, Technical Committee AFCEA International (2001–2006). 
President, DC Chapter (2005–2006). 
Vice President, DC Chapter (2004–2005). 
Treasurer, DC Chapter (2003–2004). 
Secretary, DC Chapter (2002–2003). 

Industry Advisory Council (2001–present). 
Industry Chairman, Management of Change Conference (2001). 
Information Technology Association of America (2001–present). 
Northern Virginia Technology Council (2006–present). 
Winston S. Churchill Centre (2002–present). 

Churchill Centre Fellow (2005–2007). 
Churchill Centre Associate (2006–present). 
Churchill Centre Leadership Committee (2006–present). 
Churchill Centre Audit Committee Member (2006–present). 

Council for Excellence in Government (1996–present). 
Tower Club (1996–present). 
University Club of Washington, D.C. (2006–present). 

13.  Have  you  ever  been  a  candidate  for  and/or  held  a  public  office  (elected,  non- 
elected,  or  appointed)?  If  so,  indicate  whether  any  campaign  has  any  outstanding 
debt, the amount, and whether you are personally liable for that debt. 

Yes.  I  ran  for  the  Virginia  State  Senate  in  1995.  The  campaign  has  no  out-

standing debt. 

14.  Itemize  all  political  contributions  to  any  individual,  campaign  organization, 
political  party,  political  action  committee,  or  similar  entity  of  $500  or  more  for  the 
past  10  years.  Also  list  all  offices  you  have  held  with,  and  services  rendered  to,  a 
state or national political party or election committee during the same period. 

Tom Davis for Congress 
(6/21/2001) $250.00 
(10/21/2002) $500.00 
(12/09/2003) $1,000.00 
(12/13/2005) $1,000.00 
(4/10/2006) $400.00 
(4/10/2006) $1,100.00 
(6/30/2006) $1,700.00 
Collins for Senator 
(10/09/2002) $500.00 
(3/31/2007) $1,000.00 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

22 

Snowe for Senate 
(7/27/2006) $1,000.00 
(10/18/2006) $1,000.00 
Friends of Joe Lieberman 
(11/01/2006) $500.00 
Friends of George Allen 
(11/12/1999) $500.00 
(4/12/2003) $1,000.00 
(3/23/2005) $250.00 
(6/08/2005) $1,000.00 
Federal Victory Fund 
(8/21/2003) $500.00 
(6/21/2003) $1,000.00 
Bush for President 
(8/05/1999) $500.00 
SI International Political Action Committee 
The total aggregate contribution was $8,880. 
Jeannemarie Devolites for House (Virginia House of Delegates) 
(1/29/2003) $500.00 
Mark Earley for Governor 
(7/24/2001) $1,000.00 

15. List all scholarships, fellowships, honorary degrees, honorary society member-
ships,  military  medals,  and  any  other  special  recognition  for  outstanding  service  or 
achievements. 

Department  of  Defense  Medal  for  Distinguished  Public  Service  (with  bronze 
palm), 2001. 
Association for Federal Information Resource Management, Government Execu-
tive of the Year, 2000. 
Federal Computer Week, Federal 100, 1996 and 2002. 

16.  Please  list  each  book,  article,  column,  or  publication  you  have  authored,  indi-
vidually  or  with  others.  Also  list  any  speeches  that  you  have  given  on  topics  rel-
evant  to  the  position  for  which  you  have  been  nominated.  Do  not  attach  copies  of 
these publications unless otherwise instructed. 

I  have  published  articles  for  Federal  Computer  Week  but  mostly  relating  to  tech-
nology acquisition policy (e.g., ‘‘Before Clinger-Cohen there was Chaos’’ published in 
FCW  on  June  6,  2005).  I  have  also  given  a  number  of  technology-policy  related 
speeches  although  virtually  none  were  scripted.  I  also  regularly  lecture  before  soft-
ware  acquisition  classes  at  the  Defense  Acquisition  University  on  the  development 
of technology-related acquisition statutes. 

17.  Please  identify  each  instance  in  which  you  have  testified  orally  or  in  writing 
before  Congress  in  a  governmental  or  non-governmental  capacity  and  specify  the 
date and subject matter of each testimony. 

Subcommittee  on  Technology,  Information  Policy,  Intergovernmental  Relations 
and the Census, House Committee on Government Reform, July 21, 2004, ‘‘The role 
of the Chief Information Officer in the Federal Government.’’ 

18.  Given  the  current  mission,  major  programs,  and  major  operational  objectives 
of  the  department/agency  to  which  you  have  been  nominated,  what  in  your  back-
ground  or  employment  experience  do  you  believe  affirmatively  qualifies  you  for  ap-
pointment to the position for which you have been nominated, and why do you wish 
to serve in that position? 

If  confirmed,  my  government  background  will  serve  me  well.  I  gained  valuable 
program evaluation experience at the United States General Accounting Office (now 
Government  Accountability  Office)  and  program  review  and  policy  experience  as  a 
staff  member  for  the  Subcommittee  on  the  Oversight  of  Government  Management 
of  the  Senate  Committee  on  Governmental  Affairs.  Each  of  these  roles  exposed  me 
to best practices in capital planning and investment control for technology programs 
and  prepared  me  for  my  work  at  the  Defense  Department.  At  DoD,  I  implemented 
legal  and  regulatory  requirements  in  a  very  large  and  complex  organization,  with 
a  variety  of  competing  stakeholders  (similar  to  the  situation  that,  if  confirmed,  I 
would expect to encounter at the Department of Transportation). 

Additionally,  as  a  former  board  member  and  chairman  of  the  Innovative  Tech-
nology  Authority  of  Virginia,  I  have  been  exposed  to  a  number  of  applied  research 
programs  in  a  variety  of  areas,  including  transportation.  I  understand  the  need  to 
coordinate  research,  while  transferring  and  commercializing  technology  so  that  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

23 

benefits  of  our  investment  can  be  enjoyed  by  the  public.  As  a  board  member  and 
chairman  of  the  Technology  Committee  of  the  Armed  Forces  Communications  and 
Electronics  Association,  I  was  exposed  to  a  number  of  innovative  and  cutting  edge 
technologies that can and are being applied to our Nation’s armed forces. 

I wish to serve in the Administration because I deeply believe that my prior serv-
ice  and  background  provides  me  with  a  unique  perspective  of  the  challenges  facing 
RITA. If confirmed, I will be able to make substantial and long lasting contributions 
to the operations of the agency. 

19. What do you believe are your responsibilities, if confirmed, to ensure that the 
department/agency  has  proper  management  and  accounting  controls,  and  what  ex-
perience do you have in managing a large organization? 

If  confirmed  as  RITA  Administrator,  I  will  be  charged  with  ensuring  that  the 
agency  has  proper  management  and  accounting  controls  in  place  and  that  a  high 
degree of transparency and visibility is maintained. 

I  will  also  work  closely  with  the  appropriate  Department  officials  to  ensure  reg-
ular operational and financial oversight and reporting mechanisms are in place. My 
experience  on  Capitol  Hill  allowed  me  to  work  on  legislation  specifically  designed 
to apply capital planning, investment control and portfolio management and report-
ing  to  the  Federal  Government’s  investments  in  technology.  I  believe  these  same 
principals can be applied to the Department of Transportation’s portfolio of research 
programs. 

As Deputy CIO at the Department of Defense it was my responsibility to establish 
controls  and  oversight  over  the  Department’s  $50  billion  portfolio  of  IT  invest-
ments—many  that  we  managed  by  the  individual  services  much  in  the  same  way 
many  research  programs  are  managed  by  the  individual  modal  administrations 
within the Department of Transportation. Given my background, I fully understand 
and  appreciate  the  need  for  not  just  management  and  accounting  controls  but  visi-
bility  into  the  organization  down  to  the  transaction  level.  My  most  recent  private 
sector  experience  and  past  government  experience  including  managing  one  of  the 
largest  technology  focused  oversight  organizations  in  the  Federal  Government  al-
lows me to bring a unique perspective and experience set to this role. 

20.  What  do  you  believe  to  be  the  top  three  challenges  facing  the  department/ 

agency, and why? 

I believe the top three challenges facing the department/agency are: 

1.  Coordination  of  the  research  activities  across  the  Department  of  Transpor-
tation,  including  elimination  of  duplicative  efforts.  The  Department  annually 
spends more than $1 billion on basic and applied research. 
Research  coordination  is  a  challenge  because  research  dollars  within  the  De-
partment  have  historically  been  managed  and  controlled  by  the  various  modal 
administrations.  As  a  new  mode.  RITA  must  be  sensitive  to  history  and  needs 
of  the  other  modes  while  exercising  its  statutory  responsibility  to  ensure  that 
these  dollars  yield  maximum  measurable  returns  and  benefits  to  the  taxpayer. 
In  order  to  achieve  efficient  coordination,  I  believe  it  is  important  to  bring 
stakeholders,  both  inside  and  outside  of  the  Department,  to  the  table  as  part-
ners. This relationship-building has already begun, and RITA is well-positioned 
to ensure that the Department’s research investment is coordinated, mission fo-
cused  and  directed  in  a  manner  that  is  relevant,  visible,  and  produces  measur-
able results. 
2.  Establishing  RITA’s  authority,  within  the  Department  of  Transportation,  as 
the global leader in the development of transportation technology and ensuring 
that  such  technology  is  systematically  and  rapidly  commercialized,  transferred, 
or otherwise made available to operators and citizens. 
There is a significant amount of transportation-related research and innovation 
taking  place  within  the  Department  of  Transportation,  University  Transpor-
tation Centers, and other publicly funded organizations. Combined with the sig-
nificant investment that is also occurring within other organizations, RITA has 
an  opportunity  to  identify  and  share  research  and  technological  advances  that 
can  be  timely  and  effectively  deployed  to  help  us  better  anticipate  and  address 
our  future  transportation  needs.  If  confirmed,  I  intend  to  work  to  ensure  that 
RITA  continues  along  the  path  to  becoming  the  centralized  knowledge  reposi-
tory for these activities to better share information among the modes and stake-
holders,  eliminate  redundant  efforts,  as  well  as  to  ensure  smart,  highly  lever-
aged Federal Government investment in future technology. 
3. Leverage existing and developing technologies across multiple modes. 
There  are  many  existing  and  developing  technologies  that  are  directed  for  use 
in  one  mode  but  often  have  applicability  across  multiple  modes.  For  example, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

24 

collision  avoidance  technology  that  is  developed  for  the  airline  industry  may 
also  be  applied  with  some  modification  to  other  modes  such  as  maritime  or 
highways.  Anti-fatigue  efforts  may  also  be  applied  across  modes.  If  confirmed, 
I  would  make  it  a  priority  to  ensure  that  RITA  will  look  for  opportunities  to 
leverage  existing  and  developing  technologies  and  innovations  across  all  trans-
portation modes. 

B. POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 

1.  Describe  all  financial  arrangements,  deferred  compensation  agreements,  and 
other  continuing  dealings  with  business  associates,  clients,  or  customers.  Please  in-
clude information related to retirement accounts. 

I have a deferred compensation agreement with SI International that has approxi-
mately  $61,000  remaining  that  will  be  distributed  in  three  future  disbursements. 
These disbursements are scheduled to occur at the beginning of June each year. 

If  confirmed,  I  have  agreed  to  resign  my  position  from  Procentrix  and  divest  my 

financial interest with the company. 

My  wife  works  for  Microsoft  Corporation  and  I  anticipate  recusing  myself  from 

any dealings with Microsoft Corporation. 

There  are  no  pension  or  retirement  accounts  that  are  in  the  control  of  any  com-
pany,  however,  I  have  a  401(k)  plan  that  remains  under  an  SI  International  man-
aged custodian. 

2.  Do  you  have  any  commitments  or  agreements,  formal  or  informal,  to  maintain 
employment, affiliation, or practice with any business, association or other organiza-
tion during your appointment? If so, please explain: No. 

3.  Indicate  any  investments,  obligations,  liabilities,  or  other  relationships  which 
could  involve  potential  conflicts  of  interest  in  the  position  to  which  you  have  been 
nominated: Please refer to the Deputy General Counsel’s opinion letter. 

4.  Describe  any  business  relationship,  dealing,  or  financial  transaction  which  you 
have  had  during  the  last  10  years,  whether  for  yourself,  on  behalf  of  a  client,  or 
acting  as  an  agent,  that  could  in  any  way  constitute  or  result  in  a  possible  conflict 
of interest in the position to which you have been nominated. 

There  are  three  potential  conflicts  that  could  arise.  The  first  involves  SI  Inter-
national, because I still receive deferred compensation from a program that is spon-
sored  by  them.  Under  the  terms  of  the  program  if  SI  International  were  to  become 
insolvent  I  would  no  longer  receive  distributions  under  the  program  and  would  be 
treated as an unsecured creditor. Second, my position with Procentrix could be seen 
as  a  potential  conflict,  although  I  intend  to  be  fully  divested  from  ownership  in 
Procentrix  upon  confirmation  and  will  also  resign  as  Chairman  and  CEO  at  that 
time.  Third,  there  is  a  potential  conflict  of  interest  with  Microsoft,  my  wife’s  em-
ployer. She receives compensation from the company and incentive compensation di-
rectly  related  to  the  company’s  performance  in  the  U.S.  Federal  marketplace.  I  in-
tend to recuse myself from any dealings with RITA and any of these entities. 

5. Describe any activity during the past 10 years in which you have been engaged 
for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the passage, defeat, or modifica-
tion of any legislation or affecting the administration and execution of law or public 
policy: None. 

6.  Explain  how  you  will  resolve  any  potential  conflict  of  interest,  including  any 
that may be disclosed by your responses to the above items: Please refer to the Dep-
uty General Counsel’s Opinion letter. 

C. LEGAL MATTERS 

1.  Have  you  ever  been  disciplined  or  cited  for  a  breach  of  ethics  by,  or  been  the 
subject of a complaint to any court, administrative agency, professional association, 
disciplinary committee, or other professional group? If so, please explain. No. 

2.  Have  you  ever  been  investigated,  arrested,  charged,  or  held  by  any  Federal, 
State,  or  other  law  enforcement  authority  of  any  Federal,  State,  county,  or  munic-
ipal entity, other than for a minor traffic offense? If so, please explain. No. 

3.  Have  you  or  any  business  of  which  you  are  or  were  an  officer  ever  been  in-
volved  as  a  party  in  an  administrative  agency  proceeding  or  civil  litigation?  If  so, 
please explain. No. 

4.  Have  you  ever  been  convicted  (including  pleas  of  guilty  or  nolo  contendere)  of 

any criminal violation other than a minor traffic offense? If so, please explain. 

Yes.  In  1984,  during  graduate  school  I  was  cited  for  a  noise  violation.  I  paid  a 

small fine and court costs. 

5.  Have  you  ever  been  accused,  formally  or  informally,  of  sexual  harassment  or 
discrimination  on  the  basis  of  sex,  race,  religion,  or  any  other  basis?  If  so,  please 
explain. No. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

25 

6.  Please  advise  the  Committee  of  any  additional  information,  favorable  or  unfa-
vorable,  which  you  feel  should  be  disclosed  in  connection  with  your  nomination: 
None. 

D. RELATIONSHIP WITH COMMITTEE 

1. Will you ensure that your department/agency complies with deadlines for infor-

mation set by Congressional committees? Yes. 

2.  Will  you  ensure  that  your  department/agency  does  whatever  it  can  to  protect 
Congressional  witnesses  and  whistle  blowers  from  reprisal  for  their  testimony  and 
disclosures? Yes. 

3.  Will  you  cooperate  in  providing  the  Committee  with  requested  witnesses,  in-
cluding technical experts and career employees, with firsthand knowledge of matters 
of interest to the Committee? Yes. 

4.  Are  you  willing  to  appear  and  testify  before  any  duly  constituted  committee  of 
the  Congress  on  such  occasions  as  you  may  be  reasonably  requested  to  do  so?  Yes. 

Experience 

RESUME OF PAUL RICHARD BRUBAKER 

Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, Procentrix, Inc., 2006 to present. 
Founded innovative functional and technical consulting organization. 

Created  organization  focused  on  developing  and  deploying  functional  and 
technical  expertise  to  assist  organizations  to  align  people,  processes  and 
technologies  to  achieve  dramatic  and  measurable  improvements  in  mission 
performance. 
Built  firm  of  seven  employees  and  $100K  in  monthly  revenue  serving  four 
clients  and  named  as  one  of  Federal  Computer  Week’s  Top  Ten  Organiza-
tions to Watch for 2006 in 6 months. 
Built  standard  and  repeatable  delivery  methodology  for  a  variety  of  man-
agement  processes  including  program  management,  capital  planning  and 
investment control and earned value management using commercial off the 
shelf technologies. 

Executive Vice President, Chief Marketing Officer, SI International, 2003 to 2006. 
Created a best in class organization by aligning people, resources and processes 
to achieve organizational growth goals. 

Responsible for all marketing, sales, communications and investor relations 
for a top 50 information technology firm. 
Planned  and  executed  detailed  growth  plan  that  succeeded  in  growing  the 
firm’s revenues from $160M to $400M. 
Built  best  of  class  processes,  capabilities  and  tools  that  will  enable  scaling 
marketing and sales activity to support a $1B in annual revenue. 

Founding Partner, ICG Government, 2002 to 2003. 

Developed a small firm that provided educational programs to improve perform-
ance of contractors in responding to government requirements. 
Created  a  series  of  networking  events  designed  to  increase  communication  be-
tween senior level government officials and the technology industry. 
Grew the firm to 12 retained clients and more than $150K in monthly revenue 
within the first year of operations. 

Chief Executive Officer, Aquilent Inc., 2001 to 2002. 

Hired  by  Commerce  One  to  manage  its  government  services  operation  and 
quickly organized a management buyout of this 125 person professional services 
operation. 
Led  all  aspects  of  the  management  buy  out  including  securing  investment  cap-
ital  and  banking  relationships  while  minimizing  disruption  to  clients  and  staff. 
Successfully  managed  the  transition  to  the  new  entity  and  successfully  aligned 
organization to new mission and goals post-acquisition. 

Deputy Assistant Secretary of Defense (Deputy Chief Information Officer) 2000 to 
2001;  and  Principal  Director,  Office  of  the  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  of  Defense 
(Deputy  Chief  Information  Officer)  1999  to  2000,  United  States  Department  of  De-
fense, 1999 to 2001. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

26 

Aligned 120 person organization with expanded mission requirements including 
the  DOD  response  to  the  year  2000  date  change  for  mission  critical  systems. 
Established  a  number  of  critical  operational  processes  including  governance, 
capital  planning  and  investment  control,  portfolio  management  and  policy  de-
velopment for Department-wide IT initiatives. 
Supervised  the  development  of  Department-wide  architecture  standards  and 
chairing numerous investment, policy and oversight boards. 
Responsible  for  implementation  of  Departmental  responsibilities  under  the 
Clinger-Cohen Act and other related laws and regulations. 

Vice President of Strategic Programs, Litton PRC McLean, 1997 to 1999. 

Responsible  for  the  redesign  of  the  marketing  and  communication  activities  of 
the  company  in  response  to  the  changing  Federal  marketplace  resulting  from 
changes in law, policy and government regulation. 
Advised  the  President  on  reallocation  of  company  resources  and  organizational 
alignment  to  compete  in  the  changing  market  to  include:  bidding  on  contract 
vehicles,  standing  up  tactical  sales  activity  and  engaging  in  direct  communica-
tion with buyers. 

Deputy  Staff  Director,  1994  to  1996;  Republican  Staff  Director,  1992  to  1994; 
Chief Investigator, 1991 to 1992; Senate Subcommittee on Oversight of Government 
Management, U.S. Senate, 1991 to 1996. 

Responsible  for  planning  and  executing  a  variety  of  government  oversight  ac-
tivities  on  behalf  of  the  Subcommittee  Chairman  then-Senator  William  S. 
Cohen (R-Maine). 
Responsible for leading all technology and acquisition-related oversight and leg-
islation  for  the  Subcommittee  including  the  publication  of  the  Computer  Chaos 
report issued in 1994 and the Information Technology Management Reform Act 
of 1996 (now known as the Clinger-Cohen Act). 

Evaluator, United States General Accounting Office, 1986 to 1991. 

Managed  a  number  of  cost,  schedule  and  performance  audits  of  Federal  pro-
grams  including  those  at  the  Departments  of  Veterans  Affairs,  Education,  En-
ergy and Defense including major weapons systems acquisition. 
Selected  for  a  1-year  assignment  to  the  Senate  Committee  on  Appropriations 
where  assignments  included  budget  analysis  on  the  information  technology 
spending of several departments including the Departments of Veterans Affairs 
and  Housing  and  Urban  Development  and  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space 
Administration. 

Education 

Youngstown State University, Youngstown, Ohio, 1983. 

Bachelor of Arts Degree. 

Kent State University, Kent, Ohio, 1985. 

Master of Public Administration. 

Activities 

Chairman,  Virginia  Innovative  Technology  Authority  (2001  to  2003);  board  mem-

ber (1998 to 2003). Appointed by Governor Jim Gilmore (R-Virginia). 

Chairman,  Technical  Committee,  Armed  Forces  Communications  and  Electronics 

Association (AFCEA) (2003 to 2006); Board Member (1997 to 2006). 
Principal, Council for Excellence in Government (1996 to present). 
President, AFCEA DC Chapter (2005 to 2006). 
Information Technology Association of America (1996 to present). 
Government  Electronic  Industries  Association  Board  of  Directors  (1996  to  1999). 
Associate and Fellow, the Churchill Centre (2003 to present). 
Republican Nominee for Virginia State Senate (1995). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

27 

Awards 

Government  Executive  of  the  Year,  Association  for  Federal  Information  Resource 

Managers (AFFIRM) (2001). 

Department  of  Defense  Distinguished  Public  Service  Medal  (with  palm  device) 

(2001). 

Federal Computer Week Federal 100 award (1996 and 2001). 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Brubaker. 
Our  next  nominee  will  be  the  Chief  Financial  Officer  of  the  Na-
tional  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration,  Mr.  Ronald  Spoehel. 

Mr. Spoehel? 

STATEMENT OF RONALD R. SPOEHEL, NOMINEE TO BE CHIEF 
FINANCIAL  OFFICER,  NATIONAL  AERONAUTICS  AND  SPACE 
ADMINISTRATION 
Mr.  SPOEHEL.  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee, 
thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  as  you 
consider  my  nomination  for  the  position  of  Chief  Financial  Officer 
of  NASA.  It  is  an  honor  to  be  here,  and  I  am  privileged  to  have 
been nominated by the President to this post. 

I  also  appreciate  the  time  the  Members  of  this  Committee  have 
already taken to meet with me and consider my nomination. If con-
firmed, I look forward to working with Members of this Committee 
in  addressing  the  challenges  of  maintaining  America’s  preeminent 
position in pioneering space exploration and aeronautics, while also 
undertaking  vigorous  scientific  research  programs  advancing  our 
knowledge and understanding of our own planet. 

If  confirmed  as  NASA’s  CFO,  I  am  committed  to  working  with 
Administrator  Griffin,  NASA’s  dedicated  professionals,  Congress, 
the  White  House,  the  private  sector,  and  other  key  constituencies, 
to  address  the  challenges  of  meeting  the  President’s  Vision  for 
Space  Exploration  and  the  Nation’s  objectives  for  NASA  while  un-
dertaking  the  mission  in  the  most  effective  and  efficient  manner 
possible, especially during a time when there are many other com-
peting demands for our Nation’s resources. 

The position of Chief Financial Officer of any organization carries 
a tremendous responsibility. It is the pivotal interface where budg-
et,  accountability,  and  sound  fiscal  management  all  reside.  Over 
my  career,  I  am  fortunate  to  have  gained  broad  financial  manage-
ment  and  leadership  experience  as  an  officer  and  an  executive  for 
more than 25 years, with a variety of complex, multidivisional, geo-
graphically  dispersed  companies,  with  operations  serving  the  gov-
ernment and the space community. 

I  am  familiar  with  many  of  the  challenges  of  providing  leader-
ship within organizations of global size, complexity, and scale. The 
challenges  ahead  for  NASA  are  many,  and,  if  confirmed,  I  would 
make it a priority to meet with the leadership of NASA, as well as 
each  of  the  constituencies  with  which  NASA’s  CFO  organization 
interfaces,  to  understand  the  key  challenges  ahead  for  NASA,  and 
to  work  with  my  staff  so  these  receive  appropriate  attention  and 
resources to ensure NASA’s success in meeting those challenges. 

I believe public service is a duty, a privilege, and an honor. Both 
of  my  late  parents  had  served  in  the  Federal  Government,  and  I 
had an abiding interest in space and aeronautics instilled as my fa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

28 

ther pursued his aerospace engineering career, and I had an oppor-
tunity  to  personally  witness  many  of  the  pioneering  events  in  the 
industry. I’m very enthusiastic about the opportunity, if confirmed, 
to address the challenges of the position, and to bring my financial 
and  leadership  experience  into  the  service  of  NASA  and  the  Fed-
eral Government. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  thank  you,  again, 
for your consideration of my nomination, and I look forward to an-
swering any questions you might have. 

In  deference  to  your  time  and  the  time  of  this  Committee,  I  ask 
that  the  remainder  of  my  prepared  statement,  that  was  presented 
to the Committee, be presented in its entirety and entered into the 
record. 

The CHAIRMAN. Without objection, so ordered. 
[The  prepared  statement  and  biographical  information  of  Mr. 

Spoehel follow:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RONALD R. SPOEHEL, NOMINEE TO BE CHIEF FINANCIAL 

OFFICER, NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 

Mr. Chairman, Vice Chairman, and Members of the Committee, thank you for the 
opportunity to appear before you today as you consider my nomination for the posi-
tion  of  Chief  Financial  Officer  of  NASA.  It  is  an  honor  to  be  here  and  I  am  privi-
leged  to  have  been  nominated  by  the  President  to  this  post.  I  also  appreciate  the 
time Members of this Committee already have taken to meet with me and consider 
my  nomination.  If  confirmed,  I  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Members  of  this 
Committee  in  addressing  the  challenges  of  maintaining  America’s  preeminent  posi-
tion  in  pioneering  space  exploration  and  aeronautics,  while  also  undertaking  vig-
orous  scientific  research  programs  advancing  our  knowledge  and  understanding  of 
our own planet. 

If  confirmed  as  the  NASA  Chief  Financial  Officer,  I  am  committed  to  working 
with  Administrator  Griffin,  NASA’s  dedicated  professionals,  Congress,  the  White 
House, the private sector, and other key constituencies to address the challenges of 
meeting the President’s Vision for Space Exploration and the Nation’s objectives for 
NASA,  while  undertaking  the  mission  in  the  most  effective  and  efficient  manner 
possible,  especially  during  a  time  when  there  are  other  competing  demands  for  our 
Nation’s resources. 

The  position  of  Chief  Financial  Officer  of  any  organization  carries  a  tremendous 
responsibility as the pivotal interface where budget, accountability, and sound fiscal 
management  all  reside.  It  will  be  my  goal,  if  confirmed,  to  build  upon  the  progress 
that has already been made and continue to improve the management, performance, 
and results for the Agency. 

Over  my  career,  I  am  fortunate  to  have  gained  broad  financial  management  and 
leadership experience as an officer and executive for more than 25 years with a vari-
ety of complex, multi-divisional, geographically dispersed companies with operations 
serving  the  government  and  the  space  community.  These  positions  include  having 
served  as  Executive  Vice  President,  Chief  Financial  Officer,  and  a  member  of  the 
Board of Directors of ManTech International, a NASDAQ-listed company which, for 
example,  I  led  through  the  intensive  process  of  implementing  the  internal  controls, 
accounting  and  financial  reporting  systems  necessary  for  Sarbanes-Oxley  compli-
ance.  I  have  also  served  in  general  management  as  an  executive  officer  of  other 
global  technology  companies  with  complex  multi-divisional  operations,  including 
large, established companies such as NYSE-traded Harris Corporation. 

With  experience  as  an  executive  and  officer  of  large,  complex,  multi-divisional, 
and  geographically  dispersed  public  and  private  companies,  I  am  familiar  with 
many  of  the  challenges  of  providing  leadership  within  organizations  of  global  size, 
complexity,  and  scale.  If  I  am  confirmed,  I  would  bring  to  NASA  broad  experience 
within finance and general management, as well as particular experience in coordi-
nating  successful  audits  for  large  multinational  companies  and  in  implementing 
shared  service  centers,  operational  efficiencies,  enhanced  reporting  and  analysis, 
and  internal  control  systems,  similar  to  many  of  the  requirements  under  the  Chief 
Financial  Officers  (CFO)  Act,  Federal  Financial  Management  Improvement  Act 
(FFFMIA),  the  Federal  Managers  Financial  Integrity  Act  (FMFIA),  the  Improper 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

29 

Payments  Information  Act  (IPIA),  and  the  Government  Performance  Results  Act 
(GPRA). 

The  challenges  ahead  for  NASA  are  many,  and,  if  confirmed,  I  would  make  it  a 
priority  to  meet  with  the  leadership  of  NASA  and  with  my  staff,  as  well  as  each 
of the constituencies with which NASA’s CFO organization interfaces, to understand 
the current key challenges which NASA and its CFO organization face and to work 
with  my  staff  so  that  these  receive  the  appropriate  attention  and  resources  to  en-
sure  Agency  success  in  meeting  these  challenges.  In  particular,  I  would  familiarize 
myself with the existing NASA plan to address its financial management challenges 
and assure there is a sound plan for addressing any deficiencies. I would work with 
my staff to refine and implement plans as may be appropriate and required to meet 
the  objectives  for  such  plan.  I  would  also  make  it  a  priority  to  work  with  my  staff 
to  support  Agency  efforts  to  achieve  unqualified  audit  opinions,  maintain  appro-
priate  financial  systems,  implement  strong  internal  control  systems,  and  be  a  first- 
class management organization. 

I  believe  public  service  is  a  duty,  a  privilege  and  an  honor.  Both  of  my  late  par-
ents  had  served  in  the  Federal  Government  and  I  had  an  abiding  interest  in  space 
and aeronautics instilled as my father pursued his aerospace engineering career and 
I  had  the  opportunity  to  witness  many  pioneering  events  in  the  industry.  I  am  en-
thusiastic about the opportunity, if confirmed, to address the challenges of the posi-
tion  and  to  bring  my  financial  and  leadership  experience  into  the  service  of  NASA 
and the Federal Government. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  thank  you,  again,  for  your  con-
sideration of my nomination and I look forward to answering any questions you may 
have. 

A. BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION AND QUALIFICATIONS 

1. Name (Include any former names or nicknames used): Ronald R. Spoehel. 
2. Position to which nominated: Chief Financial Officer, National Aeronautics and 

Space Administration. 

3. Date of Nomination: May 16, 2007. 
4. Address (List current place of residence and office addresses): 

Residence: Information not released to the public. 
Office: Not Applicable. 

5. Date and Place of Birth: October 28, 1957; Los Angeles, California. 
6.  Provide  the  name,  position,  and  place  of  employment  for  your  spouse  (if  mar-
ried)  and  the  names  and  ages  of  your  children  (including  stepchildren  and  children 
by a previous marriage). 

Wife: Deborah B. Spoehel, Homemaker. 
Children: Elizabeth, 11; James, 8. 

7. List all college and graduate degrees. Provide year and school attended. 
1980  The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania.
1980  The Moore School of Electrical Engineering, University of 

M.B.A. 
M.S. Engineering 

B.S. Economics 

1979  The Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania.

Pennsylvania.

8.  List  all  post-undergraduate  employment,  and  highlight  all  management-level 
jobs held and any non-managerial jobs that relate to the position for which you are 
nominated. 

Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Director, ICx Technologies, 
Inc. 
Executive  Vice  President,  Chief  Financial  Officer  and  Director,  ManTech  Inter-
national Corporation. 
Chairman, Alpine Partners, LLC. 
Chief Executive Officer and Director, Optinel Systems, Inc. 
Vice President—Corporate Development, Harris Corporation. 
Senior Vice President, ICF Kaiser International Inc. 
Vice President, Investment Banking, Lehman Brothers. 
Vice President, Bank of American NT&SA. 
Business/Program Analyst, Hughes Aircraft Company. 

9. Attach a copy of your resume. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

30 

Mr.  Spoehel  is  a  private  investor.  Previously,  he  served  as  Executive  Vice  Presi-
dent,  Chief  Financial  Officer  and  Director  of  ICx  Technologies,  an  advanced  tech-
nologies  security  solutions  company.  Prior  to  joining  ICx  in  2005,  Mr.  Spoehel  was 
Executive  Vice  President,  Chief  Financial  Officer  and  Director  of  ManTech  Inter-
national  Corporation,  a  NASDAQ-listed  government  technology  solutions  company. 
Prior to joining ManTech in 2003, he served as Chairman of Alpine Partners, LLC, 
a  private  investment  advisory  firm  he  founded  in  2002.  From  2000  to  2002,  he 
served  as  Chief  Executive  Officer  and  Director  of  Optinel  Systems,  Inc.,  an  optical 
communications  equipment  company.  From  1994  to  2000.  Mr.  Spoehel  served  as 
Vice  President—Corporate  Development  of  Harris  Corporation,  a  NYSE-listed  For-
tune  500  global  communications  equipment  and  defense  electronics  company.  From 
1990  to  1994,  he  served  as  Senior  Vice  President  of  ICF  Kaiser  International  Inc., 
a NYSE-listed company with global operations, in a variety of general management 
roles.  Prior  to  1990,  he  served  as  Vice  President,  Investment  Banking  of  Lehman 
Brothers and as Vice President of Bank of America. 

Mr. Spoehel graduated magna cum laude from the Wharton School, University of 
Pennsylvania.  He  also  received  his  MBA  from  Wharton  and  MS  Engineering  from 
the  Moore  School  of  Electrical  Engineering,  University  of  Pennsylvania.  He  has 
served on the Board of Directors of the Professional Services Council and the Advi-
sory Council for the Wharton and Engineering Schools at the University of Pennsyl-
vania.  Mr.  Spoehel  has  also  served  on  the  Boards  of  private  companies  both  in  the 
U.S. and in Europe. 

10.  List  any  advisory,  consultative,  honorary,  or  other  part-time  service  or  posi-
tions with Federal, State, or local governments, other than those listed above, with-
in the last 5 years: None. 

11 List all positions held as an officer, director, trustee, partner, proprietor, agent, 
representative,  or  consultant  of  any  corporation,  company,  firm,  partnership,  or 
other  business,  enterprise,  educational,  or  other  institution  within  the  last  5  years. 
Executive  Vice  President,  Chief  Financial  Officer  and  Director,  ICx  Tech-
nologies, Inc. 
Executive  Vice  President,  Chief  Financial  Officer  and  Director,  ManTech  Inter-
national Corporation. 
Director, Professional Services Council. 
Chairman, Alpine Partners, LLC. 
Member, University of Pennsylvania, Engineering and Wharton Schools EMTM 
Advisory Council. 
Personal Representative, Estate of Edwin H. Spoehel. 
Co-Trustee, Geraldine Spoehel Family Trust. 
Trustee, Ronald R. Spoehel Revocable Trust. 
Trustee, Deborah B. Spoehel Children’s Trust. 

12.  Please  list  each  membership  you  have  had  during  the  past  10  years  or  cur-
rently hold with any civic, social, charitable, educational, political, professional, fra-
ternal, benevolent or religious organization, private club, or other membership orga-
nization. Include dates of membership and any positions you have held with any or-
ganization. Please note whether any such club or organization restricts membership 
on the basis of sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age, or handicap. 

Organization 
Current Memberships: 
Economic Club of Washington, D.C. 
Financial Executives Institute 
Metropolitan Club of Washington, D.C. 
National Association of Corporate Directors 
Westwood Country Club, Vienna, Virginia 
Wharton Club of Washington, D.C. 
Prior Memberships: 
Armed Forces Communications and Electronics Association 
Association for Corporate Growth 
Eau Gallie Yacht Club 
Potomac Officers Club 
Professional Services Council 
University  of  Pennsylvania,  Engineering  and  Wharton  Schools 

EMTM Advisory Council 

Position 

Dates 

Member
Member
Member
Member
Member
Member

Member
Member
Member
Member
Director

2004–Present.
2003–Present.
1995–Present.
2004–Present.
2005–Present.
2003–Present.

2003–2005.
2005–2006.
1995–2000.
2004–2006.
2004–2005.

Member

1998–2003.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

31 

None  of  the  above  organizations  restricts  membership  on  the  basis  of  sex,  race, 

color, religion, national origin, age or handicap. 

13.  Have  you  ever  been  a  candidate  for  and/or  held  a  public  office  (elected,  non- 
elected,  or  appointed)?  If  so,  indicate  whether  any  campaign  has  any  outstanding 
debt, the amount. and whether you are personally liable for that debt: No. 

14.  Itemize  all  political  contributions  to  any  individual,  campaign  organization, 
political  party,  political  action  committee,  or  similar  entity  of  $500  or  more  for  the 
past  10  years.  Also  list  all  offices  you  have  held  with,  and  services  rendered  to,  a 
state or national political party or election committee during the same period. 

ICx Technologies Inc. PAC, 2006, $1,270. 
ManTech International Corporation PAC, 2004, $2,000. 
Help America’s Leaders PAC, 2004, $2,000. 
Rick Renzi for Congress, 2004, $500. 
ManTech International Corporation PAC, 2003, $2,000. 

No  offices  with  any  state  or  national  political  party  or  election  committee  have 

been held during the past 10 years. 

15. List all scholarships, fellowships, honorary degrees, honorary society member-
ships,  military  medals,  and  any  other  special  recognition  for  outstanding  service  or 
achievements. 

Hughes Aircraft Company Scholarship, 1979. 
Junior Achievement National Award Scholarship (competitive), 1975. 
Commendation from The Senate, California Legislature, July 1, 1975. 

16.  Please  list  each  book,  article,  column,  or  publication  you  have  authored,  indi-
vidually  or  with  others.  Also  list  any  speeches  that  you  have  given  on  topics  rel-
evant  to  the  position  for  which  you  have  been  nominated.  Do  not  attach  copies  of 
these publications unless otherwise instructed. None. 

17.  Please  identify  each  instance  in  which  you  have  testified  orally  or  in  writing 
before  Congress  in  a  governmental  or  non-governmental  capacity  and  specify  the 
date and subject matter of each testimony: None. 

18.  Given  the  current  mission.  major  programs,  and  major  operational  objectives 
of  the  department/agency  to  which  you  have  been  nominated,  what  in  your  back-
ground  or  employment  experience  do  you  believe  affirmatively  qualifies  you  for  ap-
pointment to the position for which you have been nominated, and why do you wish 
to serve in that position? 

Over  my  career,  I  have  obtained  broad  financial  management  and  leadership  ex-
perience  as  an  officer  and  executive  for  more  than  25  years  with  a  variety  of  com-
plex,  multi-divisional,  geographically  dispersed  companies  with  operations  serving 
the government and the space community. These positions include having served as 
Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, and a member of the Board of Di-
rectors  of  ManTech  International,  a  NASDAQ-listed  company  which,  for  example,  I 
led  through  the  intensive  process  of  implementing  the  internal  controls,  accounting 
and  financial  reporting  systems  necessary  for  Sarbanes-Oxley  compliance.  I  have 
also served in general management as an executive officer of other global technology 
companies  with  complex  multi-divisional  operations,  including  large,  established 
companies such as NYSE-traded Harris Corporation. 

I  believe  public  service  is  a  duty,  a  privilege  and  an  honor.  Both  of  my  late  par-
ents  had  served  in  the  Federal  Government  and  I  had  an  abiding  interest  in  space 
and aeronautics instilled as my father pursued his aerospace engineering career and 
I  had  the  opportunity  to  witness  many  pioneering  events  in  the  industry.  I  am  en-
thusiastic about the opportunity, if confirmed, to address the challenges of the posi-
tion  and  to  bring  my  financial  and  leadership  experience  into  the  service  of  NASA 
and the Federal Government. 

19. What do you believe are your responsibilities, if confirmed, to ensure that the 
department/agency  has  proper  management  and  accounting  controls,  and  what  ex-
perience do you have in managing a large organization? 

The position of Chief Financial Officer of any organization or Agency carries a tre-
mendous  responsibility  as  the  pivotal  interface  where  budget,  accountability,  and 
sound  fiscal  management  all  reside.  It  will  be  my  goal,  if  confirmed,  to  build  upon 
the progress that has already been made and continue to improve the management, 
performance, and results for the Agency. 

If  confirmed  as  NASA  Chief  Financial  Officer,  I  will  familiarize  myself  with  the 
existing  NASA  plan  to  address  its  financial  management  challenges  and  assure 
there  is  a  sound  plan  for  addressing  any  deficiencies.  I  would  work  with  my  staff 
to  refine  and  implement  plans  as  may  be  appropriate  and  required  to  meet  the  ob-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

32 

jectives for such plan. I would also make it a priority to work with my staff to sup-
port  Agency  efforts  to  achieve  unqualified  audit  opinions,  maintain  appropriate  fi-
nancial  systems,  have  strong  internal  control  systems,  and  be  a  first-class  manage-
ment organization. 

With experience as an executive and officer of large, complex, multi-divisional and 
geographically  dispersed  public  and  private  companies,  I  am  familiar  with  many  of 
the challenges of providing leadership within organizations of global size, complexity 
and scale. If I am confirmed, I would bring to the NASA Chief Financial Officer role 
broad experience both within finance and general management, as well as in coordi-
nating the successful audits for large multinational companies and in implementing 
shared  service  centers,  operational  efficiencies,  enhanced  reporting  and  analysis, 
and internal control systems to meet Sarbanes-Oxley and other financial control re-
quirements.  I  would  make  it  a  priority  to  bring  the  clarity  of  purpose,  steadiness 
of  execution,  and  ability  to  work  with  others  that  are  required  for  leadership  in 
building and growing a strong, diverse organization. 

20.  What  do  you  believe  to  be  the  top  three  challenges  facing  the  department/ 

agency, and why? 

Without  an  opportunity  to  fully  assess  the  situation,  I  cannot  offer  an  authori-
tative opinion at this time. However, if confirmed, I would meet with the leadership 
of NASA and with my staff as well as each of the constituencies with which NASA’s 
CFO  organization  interfaces  to  develop  a  view  of  the  current  key  challenges  which 
NASA and its CFO organization face and work with my staffs so that these receive 
the  appropriate  attention  and  resources  to  ensure  Agency  success  in  meeting  these 
challenges. 

B. POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 

1.  Describe  all  financial  arrangements,  deferred  compensation  agreements,  and 
other  continuing  dealings  with  business  associates,  clients,  or  customers.  Please  in-
clude information related to retirement accounts. 

Continued  participation  with  Harris  Corporation  Supplemental  Executive  Retire-
ment  Plan  and  ManTech  International  Corporation  401k  Plan,  and  passive  invest-
ment with D&S Group, LLC, a limited liability company of which I own 50 percent 
of the equity. 

2.  Do  you  have  any  commitments  or  agreements,  formal  or  informal,  to  maintain 
employment, affiliation, or practice with any business, association or other organiza-
tion during your appointment? If so, please explain. 

While an estate or trust may not be considered a business association or organiza-
tion.  I  note  to  ensure  thorough  disclosure  that  I  am  currently  personal  representa-
tive (executor) of my father’s estate in an unpaid capacity and I will not receive com-
pensation  for  such  services.  I  also  am  trustee  for  the  Ronald  R.  Spoehel  Revocable 
Trust,  trustee  for  the  Geraldine  Spoehel  family  trust,  and  trustee  of  a  trust  that 
has  been  established  for  my  children,  each  in  an  unpaid  capacity  and  I  will  not  re-
ceive compensation for such services. 

I  presently  intend  to  maintain  my  affiliation  with  D&S  Group,  LLC  solely  as  an 

owner and passive investor as referred to above in item B.1. 

3.  Indicate  any  investments,  obligations,  liabilities,  or  other  relationships  which 
could  involve  potential  conflicts  of  interest  in  the  position  to  which  you  have  been 
nominated. 

Continued  ownership  of  common  stock  of  ManTech  International  Corporation.  I 
also have been made aware that the following companies in which I have a financial 
interest  do  business  with  NASA,  although  it  is  not  anticipated  that  my  official  du-
ties  will  include  matters  that  will  involve  these  companies:  Cisco  Systems,  Inc., 
Walt  Disney  Co.,  Exxon  Mobile  Corp.,  Harris  Corporation,  Hewlett-Packard  Co., 
Intel Corp., Motorola, Inc., Staples, Inc., Texas Instruments, Inc., and United Tech-
nologies,  Inc.  If  a  matter  including  one  of  these  companies  does  arise,  however,  I 
would  seek  advice  from  the  NASA  General  Counsel  or  his  designated  NASA  ethics 
official about ways in which to avoid a conflict of interest. 

4.  Describe  any  business  relationship,  dealing,  or  financial  transaction  which  you 
have  had  during  the  last  10  years,  whether  for  yourself,  on  behalf  of  a  client,  or 
acting  as  an  agent,  that  could  in  any  way  constitute  or  result  in  a  possible  conflict 
of interest in the position to which you have been nominated. 

Ownership of common stock of ManTech International Corporation and participa-
tion  in  the  Harris  Corporation  Senior  Executive  Retirement  Plan.  Executive  Vice 
President, Chief Financial Officer and Director, ManTech International Corporation. 
5. Describe any activity during the past 10 years in which you have been engaged 
for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the passage, defeat, or modifica-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

33 

tion of any legislation or affecting the administration and execution of law or public 
policy: None. 

6.  Explain  how  you  will  resolve  any  potential  conflict  of  interest,  including  any 

that may be disclosed by your responses to the above items. 

If  confirmed  as  NASA  Chief  Financial  Officer,  as  required  by  18  U.S.C.  § 208(a), 
I will not participate personally and substantially in any particular matter that has 
a direct and predictable effect on my financial interests or those of any other person 
whose interests are imputed to me, unless I first obtain a written waiver, pursuant 
to § 208(b)(1), or qualify for a regulatory exemption, pursuant to § 208(b)(2). 

I understand that my stock in ManTech International Corporation presents a po-
tential  conflict  of  interest  under  § 208(a),  although  it  has  been  determined  that  it 
is  not  necessary  at  this  time  for  me  to  divest  this  stock.  I  will  not  participate  per-
sonally and substantially in any particular matter that has a direct and predictable 
effect on the financial interests of ManTech International Corporation, unless I first 
obtain a written waiver or qualify for a regulatory exemption. 

In addition, if confirmed, for the duration of my government service: (i) I will not 
provide  any  services  or  management  to  D&S  Group,  LLC  including  voting  or  any 
other  decision-making  activity  and  instead,  I  will  become  solely  a  passive  investor; 
(ii) I will not communicate any instruction, preference or recommendation regarding 
the  investment  decisions  of  D&S  Group,  LLC;  (iii)  I  will  not  participate  personally 
and  substantially  in  any  particular  matter  that  has  a  direct  and  predictable  effect 
on the financial interests of D&S Group, LLC, unless I first obtain a written waiver; 
(iv) I understand it will be my responsibility to monitor the holdings of D&S Group, 
LLC in order to determine whether it has acquired any financial interest that poses 
a potential conflict with the duties of my position and in the event any such acquisi-
tion  occurs,  I  will  notify  and  consult  with  the  NASA  General  Counsel  or  his  des-
ignated NASA ethics official about ways in which to avoid a conflict of interest; and, 
(v)  I  will  not  communicate  with  any  investor  or  prospective  investor  about  D&S 
Group, LLC. 

I  understand  that  the  U.S.  Office  of  Government  Ethics  has  issued  certain  regu-
latory exemptions to 18 U.S.C. § 208 that depend on the aggregate value of financial 
interests  affected  by  a  particular  matter.  I  understand  that  the  de  minimis  thresh-
olds for these exemptions vary depending upon whether a particular matter involves 
specific  panics  or  whether  it  is  a  particular  matter  of  general  applicability.  While 
I understand that these exemptions may, in appropriate cases, permit me to partici-
pate in matters affecting entities in which I have financial interests, I will be aware 
of the specific limitations of these exemptions and remain alert to the potential that 
my  financial  interests  may  increase  in  value  beyond  these  de  minimis  thresholds. 
In  the  event  there  is  a  need  for  my  participation  in  matters  affecting  entities  in 
which I have such financial interests, I will work with a NASA ethics official to take 
appropriate steps to prevent any conflict. 

C. LEGAL MATTERS 

1.  Have  you  ever  been  disciplined  or  cited  for  a  breach  of  ethics  by,  or  been  the 
subject of a complaint to any court, administrative agency, professional association, 
disciplinary committee, or other professional group? If so, please explain. No. 

2.  Have  you  ever  been  investigated,  arrested,  charged,  or  held  by  any  Federal, 
State,  or  other  law  enforcement  authority  of  any  Federal,  State,  county,  or  munic-
ipal entity, other than for a minor traffic offense? If so, please explain. No. 

3.  Have  you  or  any  business  of  which  you  are  or  were  an  officer  ever  been  in-
volved  as  a  party  in  an  administrative  agency  proceeding  or  civil  litigation?  If  so, 
please explain. 

While  an  officer  of  Bank  of  America.  Lehman,  ICF  Kaiser,  Harris  Corporation. 
and ManTech International Corporation, there may have been proceedings or litiga-
tion  during  my  affiliation  with  those  organizations;  however,  I  was  not  personally 
named or involved in any proceedings or litigation. 

4.  Have  you  ever  been  convicted  (including  pleas  of  guilty  or  nolo  contendere)  of 
any  criminal  violation  other  than  a  minor  traffic  offense?  If  so,  please  explain.  No. 
5.  Have  you  ever  been  accused,  formally  or  informally,  of  sexual  harassment  or 
discrimination  on  the  basis  of  sex,  race,  religion,  or  any  other  basis?  If  so,  please 
explain. No. 

6.  Please  advise  the  Committee  of  any  additional  information,  favorable  or  unfa-
vorable,  which  you  feel  should  be  disclosed  in  connection  with  your  nomination: 
None. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

34 

D. RELATIONSHIP WITH COMMITTEE 

1. Will you ensure that your department/agency complies with deadlines for infor-

mation set by Congressional committees? Yes. 

2.  Will  you  ensure  that  your  department/agency  does  whatever  it  can  to  protect 
Congressional  witnesses  and  whistle  blowers  from  reprisal  for  their  testimony  and 
disclosures? Yes. 

3.  Will  you  cooperate  in  providing  the  Committee  with  requested  witnesses,  in-
cluding technical experts and career employees, with firsthand knowledge of matters 
of interest to the Committee? Yes. 

4.  Are  you  willing  to  appear  and  testify  before  any  duly  constituted  committee  of 
the  Congress  on  such  occasions  as  you  may  be  reasonably  requested  to  do  so?  Yes. 

The CHAIRMAN. And I thank you very much, Mr. Spoehel. 
Rear  Admiral  William  Sutton,  United  States  Navy  (Retired), 
nominee  for  the  Assistant  Secretaryship  for  Manufacturing  and 
Services, United States Department of Commerce. 

Welcome, sir, good to see you again. 

STATEMENT OF REAR ADMIRAL WILLIAM G. SUTTON, 
USN (RET.), NOMINEE TO BE ASSISTANT SECRETARY 

FOR MANUFACTURING AND SERVICES, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Admiral SUTTON. Yes, sir, Senator, good to see you, too. 
Mr.  Chairman,  distinguished  Members  of  the  Committee,  it’s 
truly  an  honor  to  appear  before  you  today  as  the  nominee  for  the 
position of Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Manufacturing and 
Services within the International Trade Administration. 

I  want  to  thank  President  Bush  and  Secretary  Gutierrez  for  ex-
pressing  their  confidence  in  me  through  this  nomination.  And,  if 
confirmed, it will be an honor to undertake this challenge. 

First,  I  would  also  like  to  introduce  some  members  of  my  family 

who are here with me today. 

The CHAIRMAN. Oh, please do. I’m sorry. 
Admiral SUTTON. My wife, Claudia, who has had the toughest job 
in  the  world,  which  is  being  a  Navy  wife,  her  sister,  Cynthia,  and 
our two lovely nieces, Meredith and Caroline. 

[Applause.] 
Admiral  SUTTON.  Also,  I’d  like  to  recognize  my  fellow  nominees 
here on the panel. And, if confirmed, I look forward to joining gov-
ernment service alongside them once again. 

Over  the  last  several  weeks,  I  have  enjoyed  meeting  with  many 
of you and your staff members, and have noted, and do appreciate, 
both  your  concerns  and  your  words  of  encouragement.  And,  if  con-
firmed,  I  look  forward  to  continuing  this  dialogue  and  to  working 
closely with the members of this Committee. 

I grew up in a small town in south Georgia, then spent the next 
30  years  as  a  naval  officer,  with  almost  11  years  either  underway 
or forward-deployed. My schooling in ship design and construction, 
and Navy assignments in education and government affairs, led to 
my  next  career  of  over  5  years  in  the  private  sector  representing 
a  uniquely  American  manufacturing  industry,  both  domestically 
and  abroad.  These  experiences  have  provided  firsthand  knowledge 
and a deep appreciation for the challenges we face as globalization 
evolves. 

The trade association I was privileged to lead for the last 5 years 
represented  the  manufacturers  of  over  90  percent  of  the  air-condi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

35 

tioning  and  commercial  refrigeration  products  made  in  the  United 
States. During over 80 visits to plants of all shapes, sizes, and lev-
els of sophistication, from mom-and-pop operations to large, highly 
productive  global  conglomerates,  I  saw  one  common  thread:  U.S. 
manufacturers  can  compete  successfully  with  anybody,  given  a 
level playing field. 

My  association  represented  our  manufacturers  in  the  Federal 
and  State  regulatory  processes.  We  developed  performance  stand-
ards  and  administered  equipment  certification  programs.  We  were 
also involved daily in issues of market access, intellectual property 
rights,  and  tariffs.  And  our  members  were  constantly  wrestling 
with the increasing costs of manufacturing and growing global com-
petition.  So,  as  you  can  see,  the  industry  I  represented,  and  the 
issues it was facing, were microcosms of what is happening to U.S. 
industry. 

I  also  have  come  to  understand  that,  with  the  recent  advances 
in  both  technology  and  in  manufacturing  productivity,  logistics, 
and financial sophistication, that manufacturing and services, their 
issues  are  now  fully  and  inextricably  linked  and  merged.  As  a  re-
sult,  my  experience  with  this  part  of  U.S.  industry  has  given  me 
a  true  appreciation  of  what  the  Office  of  Manufacturing  and  Serv-
ices  can  be  doing,  in  a  broader  sense.  Every  policy,  regulation,  or 
law  should  be  made  with  an  eye  toward  the  U.S.  worker  and  U.S. 
industry’s  competitiveness.  Our  market-driven  economy,  with  its 
transparency  and  sense  of  fair  play,  should  be  the  future  of 
globalization. Our way of doing business should be our number-one 
export.  I  think  that  is  one  of  the  best  ways  for  us  to  stay  competi-
tive as globalization evolves. 

Freedom  of  the  seas  facilitates  trade,  and  our  founding  fathers 
understood  this  concept  when  they  stated,  ‘‘We  will  maintain  a 
navy.’’  At  the  same  time,  market-access  limitations,  barriers,  and 
unfair costs stifle fair competition. So, it’s obvious that, during the 
evolution of globalization, there needs to be an advocate within our 
system  to  try  and  make  sense  of  any  particular  U.S.  industry’s  di-
lemma. We need to make sure that the proposed policies and regu-
lations  are  fully  vetted  to  prevent  the  always-present  unintended 
consequence  perhaps  affecting  another  industry  or  another  indus-
try segment. 

While at my trade association, I saw the Office of Manufacturing 
and Services analyzing costs and providing data. I saw it maintain-
ing  an  industry  dialogue  through  the  advisory  committees  and  the 
councils  and  boards,  such  as  the  Manufacturing  Council.  And, 
while I wasn’t directly involved, I understand the Travel and Tour-
ism Board also works very closely with this Committee. 

The manufacturers and services-sector experts have been able to 
provide critical data to the other Federal agencies and to Congress, 
with  an  eye  on  competitiveness.  So,  when  I  was  asked  to  take  on 
this  challenge,  my  first  thoughts  were,  what  could  I  possibly  do? 
And how could I make a difference? 

If confirmed, I will focus the office on providing practical and ac-
tionable input to the regulatory and policy processes. With the evo-
lution of globalization, I see U.S. global competitiveness needing to 
start  right  here  at  home.  I  will  work  toward  decreasing  the  pre-
mium that U.S. employers pay to manufacture and operate here in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

36 

the U.S. My goal will be to help develop and maintain an environ-
ment  in  which  the  smart  business  decision  for  any  U.S.  company 
will be to open or expand, right here. 

I  will  also  look  at  how  the  services  sector  is  integrated  into  our 
economy,  and  work  to  ensure  it  receives  appropriate  weight  in  the 
office’s input to the policymakers. 

The voice of the U.S. manufacturing and services worker must be 
heard, and, if confirmed, I also hope to establish the Office of Man-
ufacturing and Services as the go-to office for evaluating policy im-
pacts  on  the  domestic  and  global  competitiveness  of  U.S.  industry. 
It  has  a  highly  competent  staff  of  industry  and  sector  experts 
who can be brought to bear to aid Congress and the Federal agen-
cies  with  the  complex  questions  that  are  arising  during  the  evo-
lution of globalization. 

I  truly  believe  it  is  honorable  to  be  in  government  service,  and, 
if confirmed, I hope to contribute to the competitiveness of all U.S. 
industry,  which  will  equate  to  improving  our  quality  of  life,  and 
will improve our prospects for the future. 

Thank you for this opportunity, and I’ll be happy to answer your 

questions. 

[The biographical information of Admiral Sutton follows:] 

A. BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION AND QUALIFICATIONS 

1. Name (Include any former names or nicknames used): 

William Glenn Sutton. 
Nickname: Woody. 

2.  Position  to  which  nominated:  Assistant  Secretary  for  Manufacturing  and  Serv-

ices, U.S. Department of Commerce. 

3. Date of Nomination: May 4, 2007. 
4.  Address  (List  current  place  of  residence  and  office  addresses):  Information  not 

available to the public. 

5. Date and Place of Birth: July 5, 1948; Brunswick, Georgia. 
6.  Provide  the  name,  position,  and  place  of  employment  for  your  spouse  (if  mar-
ried)  and  the  names  and  ages  of  your  children  (including  stepchildren  and  children 
by a previous marriage). 

Claudia  Mansfield  Sutton  (spouse),  Associate  Executive  Director,  American  As-
sociation of School Administrators (AASA), Arlington, VA; No Children. 
7. List all college and graduate degrees. Provide year and school attended. 

Master  of  Science  Degree  in  Naval  Architecture  and  Marine  Engineering,  Mas-
sachusetts Institute of Technology, Cambridge, MA, June, 1971. 
Bachelor  of  Science  Degree  in  Naval  Engineering,  United  States  Naval  Acad-
emy, Annapolis, MD, June 1970. 

8.  List  all  post-undergraduate  employment,  and  highlight  all  management-level 
jobs held and any non-managerial jobs that relate to the position for which you are 
nominated. 

Career  Naval  Officer,  June  1970  to  July  2000.  See  attached  Navy  Biography. 
President, Air-Conditioning and Refrigeration Institute (ARI), December 2001 to 
February  2007,  representing  the  manufacturers  of  commercial  air-conditioning 
and refrigeration products. See attached resume. 
Leadership  and  management  roles  throughout  Navy  career,  and  standards  de-
velopment, certification program administration; and legislative, regulatory and 
global  trade  advocacy  while  running  a  major  manufacturers’  trade  association 
relate to the position. 

9.  Attach  a  copy  of  your  resume.  Resume  and  Naval  career  biography  attached. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

37 

10.  List  any  advisory,  consultative,  honorary,  or  other  part-time  service  or  posi-
tions with Federal, State, or local governments, other than those listed above, with-
in the last 5 years: None. 

11.  List  all  positions  held  as  an  officer,  director,  trustee,  partner,  proprietor, 
agent, representative, or consultant of any corporation, company, firm, partnership, 
or  other  business,  enterprise,  educational,  or  other  institution  within  the  last  5 
years. 

President, Air-Conditioning and Refrigeration Institute (ARI), Arlington, VA. 
Director, Clifford H. ‘‘Ted’’ Reese Scholarship Foundation, Arlington, VA. 
Director,  Air-Conditioning  and  Refrigeration  Technology  Institute  (ARTI),  Ar-
lington, VA. 
Director, North American Technician Excellence (NATE), Arlington, VA. 
Director, American National Standards Institute (ANSI), Washington, D.C. 
Director, National Association of Manufacturers Council of Manufacturing Asso-
ciations (NAM CMA), Washington, D.C. 
Secretary-Treasurer,  Association  Education  and  Business  Institute  Inc.  (AEBI), 
Arlington, VA. 

12.  Please  list  each  membership  you  have  had  during  the  past  10  years  or  cur-
rently hold with any civic, social, charitable, educational, political, professional, fra-
ternal, benevolent or religious organization, private club. or other membership orga-
nization. Include dates of membership and any positions you have held with any or-
ganization. Please note whether any such club or organization restricts membership 
on the basis of sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age, or handicap. 

USNA Alumni Association, Annapolis, MD, 1970 to present. 
MIT Alumni Association, Cambridge, MA, 1971 to present. 
U.S. Naval Institute. Annapolis, MD, 1978 to present. 
Surface Navy Association. Alexandria, VA, 1988 to present. 
Army Navy Country Club, Arlington, VA, 1989 to present. 
AARP, Washington, D.C., 2000 to present. 
Pearl Harbor Lodge, F&AM, Honolulu, HI, 1999 to present. 
Navy League of the United States, Arlington, VA, 2000 to present. 
MOAA, Alexandria, VA, 2000 to present. 
The Army and Navy Club, Washington, D.C., 2002 to present. 
United  States  Naval  Historical  Foundation,  Washington,  D.C.,  2006  to  present. 
13.  Have  you  ever  been  a  candidate  for  and/or  held  a  public  office  (elected,  non- 
elected,  or  appointed)?  If  so,  indicate  whether  any  campaign  has  any  outstanding 
debt, the amount, and whether you are personally liable for that debt: No. 

14.  Itemize  all  political  contributions  to  any  individual,  campaign  organization, 
political  party,  political  action  committee,  or  similar  entity  of  $500  or  more  for  the 
past  10  years.  Also  list  all  offices  you  have  held  with,  and  services  rendered  to,  a 
state or national political party or election committee during the same period. 

American  Society  of  Association  Executives  PAC  2005—$250,  2006—$250, 
2007—$250. 

15. List all scholarships, fellowships, honorary degrees, honorary society member-
ships,  military  medals,  and  any  other  special  recognition  for  outstanding  service  or 
achievements. 

Military Medals: 
Defense Superior Service Medal (DSSM). 
Legion of Merit (5 awards). 
Meritorious Service Medal (2 awards). 
Navy Commendation Medal. 
Navy Achievement Medal. 
Navy Unit Commendation Medal. 
Meritorious Unit Commendation (2 awards). 
Navy ‘‘E’’ (5 awards). 
Navy Expeditionary Medal. 
Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal. 
Armed Forces Service Medal. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

38 

Southwest Asia Service Medal (2 awards). 
Sea Service Deployment Ribbon (3 awards). 
Kuwait Liberation Medal. 
Expert Pistol and Rifle Medals. 

16.  Please  list  each  book,  article,  column,  or  publication  you  have  authored,  indi-
vidually  or  with  others.  Also  list  any  speeches  that  you  have  given  on  topics  rel-
evant  to  the  position  for  which  you  have  been  nominated.  Do  not  attach  copies  of 
these publications unless otherwise instructed. 

No books, but numerous articles and speeches during my Naval Career primarily 
at  Changes  of  Commands  or  official  events,  highlighting  particular  accomplish-
ments,  or  the  need  for  a  strong  Naval  presence  around  the  globe  in  order  to  influ-
ence events. While at ARI, as the spokesman for the HVACR manufacturing indus-
try,  articles  and  speeches  were  to  highlight  the  good  done  by  the  industry  and  to 
advocate responsible manufacturing. As the president of its manufacturing trade as-
sociation the central theme was to develop a positive identity for the industry. 

17.  Please  identify  each  instance  in  which  you  have  testified  orally  or  in  writing 
before  Congress  in  a  governmental  or  non-governmental  capacity  and  specify  the 
date and subject matter of each testimony. 

Written testimony as President of ARI before the House Committee on Ways and 
Means  Subcommittee  on  Select  Revenue  Measures  in  September  2006.  Subject  was 
legislation  introduced  by  the  Honorable  Peter  Hoekstra  to  modify  the  depreciation- 
holding period for commercial heating, ventilation, air-conditioning and refrigeration 
from 39 years to 20 years. 

18.  Given  the  current  mission,  major  programs,  and  major  operational  objectives 
of  the  department/agency  to  which  you  have  been  nominated,  what  in  your  back-
ground  or  employment  experience  do  you  believe  affirmatively  qualifies  you  for  ap-
pointment to the position for which you have been nominated, and why do you wish 
to serve in that position? 

The  operational  command  assignments  afloat  and  government  relations  assign-
ments  ashore  while  in  the  Navy  coupled  with  an  engineering  background  provided 
a broad leadership, management and advocacy perspective. Over the last 5 years as 
president of a major U.S. manufacturing industry trade association, experience with 
standards development, product performance certification, regulatory activities, and 
globalization  issues  have  provided  a  perspective  into  issues  facing  the  manufac-
turing and services industries today. 

When asked to take on this challenge, I accepted because these perspectives may 
enable  me  to  contribute  as  an  advocate  within  the  system  for  the  competitiveness 
of  the  U.S.  manufacturing  and  services  industries.  If  confirmed,  I  look  forward  to 
working with this Committee and Congress on important issues related to manufac-
turing and services. 

19. What do you believe are your responsibilities, if confirmed, to ensure that the 
department/agency  has  proper  management  and  accounting  controls,  and  what  ex-
perience do you have in managing a large organization? 

To set the example and ensure appropriate controls, and checks and balances are 
in  place;  and  to  ensure  that  they  are  maintained.  My  experiences  in  command  at 
sea and ashore in the Navy, and as president of a major manufacturer’s trade asso-
ciation have provided the appropriate background, experience and training to ensure 
our  highly  skilled  and  trained  Manufacturing  and  Services  workforce  has  the  nec-
essary  tools  and  resources  to  accomplish  their  mission  on  behalf  of  American  busi-
ness and workers. 

20.  What  do  you  believe  to  be  the  top  three  challenges  facing  the  department/ 

agency, and why? 

U.S. manufacturing and services competitiveness. There are numerous challenges 

under that topic, but at the top would be: 

(1)  reducing  the  structural  costs  facing  U.S.  manufacturers,  which  put  us  at  a 
disadvantage globally. 
(2) a real need to decrease overseas IPR violations, and 
(3) strengthening American industry’s competitive position in the global market-
place by increasing exports of U.S. goods and services. 

B. POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 

1.  Describe  all  financial  arrangements,  deferred  compensation  agreements,  and 
other  continuing  dealings  with  business  associates,  clients,  or  customers.  Please  in-
clude information related to retirement accounts. 

Receive retirement benefits as a 30-year retiree from the United States Navy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

39 

2.  Do  you  have  any  commitments  or  agreements,  formal  or  informal,  to  maintain 
employment, affiliation, or practice with any business, association or other organiza-
tion during your appointment? If so, please explain. 

I will retain my position as Secretary of the Association, Education, and Business 
Institute,  Inc.  (AEBI),  which  is  my  wife’s  education  consulting  S-Corp.  It  is  cur-
rently dormant. 

3.  Indicate  any  investments,  obligations,  liabilities,  or  other  relationships  which 
could  involve  potential  conflicts  of  interest  in  the  position  to  which  you  have  been 
nominated. 

As noted in my ethics agreement, stock holdings of Ametek, Inc., Centerpoint En-
ergy, IBM, JC Penney, Reliant Energy, Inc., Sunoco, and Volt Information Sciences 
could involve potential or perceived conflicts of interest. 

4.  Describe  any  business  relationship,  dealing,  or  financial  transaction  which  you 
have  had  during  the  last  10  years,  whether  for  yourself,  on  behalf  of  a  client,  or 
acting  as  an  agent,  that  could  in  any  way  constitute  or  result  in  a  possible  conflict 
of interest in the position to which you have been nominated: None. 

5. Describe any activity during the past 10 years in which you have been engaged 
for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the passage, defeat, or modifica-
tion of any legislation or affecting the administration and execution of law or public 
policy. 

Provided written testimony (see A. 17. above) for the ‘‘Cool and Efficient Buildings 
Act,’’  advocating  changing  the  depreciation  for  commercial  heating  air-conditioning 
and refrigeration systems from 39 to 20 years. 

6.  Explain  how  you  will  resolve  any  potential  conflict  of  interest,  including  any 

that may be disclosed by your responses to the above items. 

I  have  executed  an  ethics  agreement  in  which  I  have  agreed  to  divest  my/my 
wife’s  stock  holding  in  Ametek,  Inc.,  Centerpoint  Energy,  IBM,  JC  Penny,  Reliant 
Energy, Inc., Sunoco, and Volt Information Sciences, within 90 days of confirmation. 
Further,  I  have  agreed  that  until  divestitures  are  complete,  I  will  not  participate 
personally  and  substantially  in  any  particular  matter  that  will  have  a  direct  and 
predictable  effect  on  the  financial  interests  of  these  entities,  unless  I  first  obtain  a 
written  waiver  or  qualify  for  a  regulatory  exemption.  Also,  if  confirmed,  and  if  my 
wife  begins  to  take  on  any  new  clients  at  AEBI,  I  will  consult  with  a  Department 
of  Commerce  ethics  counsel  to  ensure  propriety,  and  I  will  be  non-participatory  in 
AEBI businesses activities. Additionally, I have agreed to not participate personally 
and  substantially  in  any  particular  matter  involving  specific  parties  of  ARI  or 
AASA, unless I am authorized to participate. 

C. LEGAL MATTERS 

missed case. 

1.  Have  you  ever  been  disciplined  or  cited  for  a  breach  of  ethics  by,  or  been  the 
subject of a complaint to any court, administrative agency, professional association, 
disciplinary committee, or other professional group? If so, please explain: No. 

2.  Have  you  ever  been  investigated,  arrested,  charged,  or  held  by  any  Federal, 
State.  or  other  law  enforcement  authority  of  any  Federal,  State.  county,  or  munic-
ipal entity, other than for a minor traffic offense? If so, please explain. 

Charged  with  DUI  in  Middletown,  Rhode  Island  in  November  1989.  Judge  dis-

3.  Have  you  or  any  business  of  which  you  are  or  were  an  officer  ever  been  in-
volved  as  a  party  in  an  administrative  agency  proceeding  or  civil  litigation?  If  so, 
please explain: No. 

4.  Have  you  ever  been  convicted  (including  pleas  of  guilty  or  nolo  contendere)  of 
any  criminal  violation  other  than  a  minor  traffic  offense?  If  so,  please  explain:  No. 
5.  Have  you  ever  been  accused,  formally  or  informally,  of  sexual  harassment  or 
discrimination  on  the  basis  of  sex,  race,  religion,  or  any  other  basis?  If  so,  please 
explain: No. 

6.  Please  advise  the  Committee  of  any  additional  information,  favorable  or  unfa-
vorable,  which  you  feel  should  be  disclosed  in  connection  with  your  nomination: 
None. 

D. RELATIONSHIP WITH COMMITTEE 

1. Will you ensure that your department/agency complies with deadlines for infor-

mation set by Congressional committees? Yes, to the best of my ability. 

2.  Will  you  ensure  that  your  department/agency  does  whatever  it  can  to  protect 
Congressional  witnesses  and  whistle  blowers  from  reprisal  for  their  testimony  and 
disclosures? Yes, to the best of my ability. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

40 

3.  Will  you  cooperate  in  providing  the  Committee  with  requested  witnesses,  in-
cluding technical experts and career employees, with firsthand knowledge of matters 
of interest to the Committee? Yes, to the best of my ability. 

4.  Are  you  willing  to  appear  and  testify  before  any  duly  constituted  committee  of 
the  Congress  on  such  occasions  as  you  may  be  reasonably  requested  to  do  so?  Yes. 

RESUME OF WILLIAM G. SUTTON 

Professional Profile 

Experienced Chief Executive with over 5 years leading and transforming a major 
manufacturing  trade  association  into  a  forward-looking  and  highly-involved  organi-
zation  fully-engaged  in  the  regulatory  policy  debate  and  with  an  aggressive  legisla-
tive and education agenda; and, over thirty years in leadership positions serving in 
the United States Navy both afloat and ashore, achieving the rank of Rear Admiral. 
Unique  background  includes  seven  CEO/COO-equivalent  assignments  and  substan-
tial  leadership  expertise  in  change  management,  advocacy,  international  relations, 
education,  marketing,  standards  development,  and  certification  program  manage-
ment. Board experience includes the American National Standards Institute (ANSI), 
the National Association of Manufacturers (NAM), the Clifford H. Rees Scholarship 
Foundation, and North American Technician Excellence (NATE). 
Employment History 

President,  Air-Conditioning  and  Refrigeration  Institute  (ARI),  October  2001  to 

February 2007. 

ARI  is  the  trade  association  representing  manufacturers  of  air-conditioning  and 
commercial refrigeration equipment in North America. With a $14.5M annual budg-
et  and  a  staff  of  42,  it  is  an  internationally  recognized  leader  in  both  the  develop-
ment of standards and in the administration of certification programs pertaining to 
the performance of air-conditioning, ventilation, and refrigeration products. ARI also 
serves  as  a  major  advocate  for  the  heating,  ventilation,  air-conditioning  and  refrig-
eration  (HVACR)  industry  domestically  and  U.S.  manufacturing  competitiveness 
globally. 
Advocacy 

Developed  and  implemented  a  coordinated  advocacy  and  communications  effort 
that placed ARI in a position to advance its members’ agenda and lead in indus-
try issues, replacing the former reactionary approach. 
Brought all of the HVACR industry associations together into a significant part-
nership  effort  and  guided  the  industry  forward  through  legislative,  regulatory, 
educational and technician certification initiatives. 
Increased  ARI’s  influence  globally  and  successfully  led  a  major  federation  of 
international  manufacturing  associations  through  activities  such  as  intellectual 
property disputes and international advocacy cooperation. 
Opened doors and established communications lines with historic opponents, ad-
vancing the ARI agenda. 
Active in both the NAM and U.S. Chamber of Commerce in manufacturing com-
petitiveness issues. 
Provided  leadership  and  was  the  primary  spokesman  in  speeches,  articles  and 
interviews for ARI and the HVACR industry both on a routine basis and during 
several significant industry initiatives and crises. 

Services to Members 

Designed  and  completely  restructured  the  member  dues  system  to  be  fair,  sim-
ple and predictable. 
Grew by almost 40 percent and improved the processes and value of the product 
performance certification programs. 
Led  and  coordinated  the  initial  $1.4M  fundraising  effort  which  established  the 
Rees Scholarship Foundation. 
Increased  member  services  and  benefits  through  increased  efficiencies  while 
growing ARI over 25 percent. 
Moved  ARI  from  paper  to  web-based,  and  improved  internal  and  external  com-
munications. 
Successfully  integrated  the  industry’s  technician  certification  program  into 
every activity and initiative. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

41 

Internal Management 

Quickly  gained  control  of  escalating  expenses  and  managed  the  budget  to  re-
store reserves. 
Developed  and  led  highly  successful  and  major  branding,  marketing,  and  press 
relations efforts. 
Energized  the  budget  and  investment  committee  process  and  engaged  ARI  in 
active portfolio management. 
Improved the governance process and procedures through board and staff train-
ing programs. 
Instituted  formal  schedule  and  milestone  planning,  staff  feedback  and  recogni-
tion,  and  ethics,  wellness  and  social  programs  resulting  in  a  professional  and 
effective staff and a healthy and positive work environment. 

United States Navy Career 

Commander, Amphibious Group Two, February 1999 to July 2000. 

Headquartered in Norfolk, Virginia; responsibility to organize, train, equip, and 
prepare  Sailors  to  respond  to  national  tasking  for  the  largest  group  command 
in the U.S. Navy: 38 ship and shore commands, over 19 billion dollars in capital 
assets, and 14,500 military and civilian personnel. Significant interagency expe-
rience  as  task  force  commander  for  the  EgyptAir  flight  990  crash  recovery  ef-
fort. 

Commander, Naval Base Pearl Harbor, Commander, Naval Surface Group Middle 

Pacific, September 1996 to January 1999. 

Regional  Commander  for  all  Navy  activities  statewide  in  Hawaii  and  Group 
Commander with training, maintenance and operational responsibility for all 17 
surface ships homeported in Pearl Harbor. Leadership, management, and agen-
cy  and  government  liaison  responsibilities  for  all  Navy  personnel  and  facilities 
in Hawaii and Antarctica. 

Chief of Staff, Commander Second Fleet and Commander Striking Fleet Atlantic, 

June 1994 to August 1996. 

Embarked  in  the  flagship  homeported  in  Norfolk,  Virginia;  responsible  for  the 
direction  of  a  staff  of  160  men  and  women  planning,  organizing,  coordinating, 
and  directing  all  surface  and  air  operations  throughout  the  U.S.  Atlantic  Fleet 
and  within  NATO’s  Atlantic  operating  area.  Director  of  a  major  joint  services 
operational staff. 

Previous Assignments include: 

Naval  Aide  to  President  Reagan  1983–1985;  Director  of  Programs,  Navy  Office 
of  Legislative  Affairs  1990–1992;  Commander,  Destroyer  Squadron  Two  Four 
1992–1994;  Director,  Prospective  Commanding  Officer  School:  Member,  Naval 
Academy Honor Review Board; Instructor, Naval Engineering, U.S. Naval Acad-
emy; and various assignments in destroyers, frigates, and surface support ships. 

Education 

Massachusetts Institute of Technology. 

Master  of  Science  in  Naval  Architecture  and  Marine  Engineering  (June  1971). 

United States Naval Academy. 

Bachelor of Science in Naval Engineering (June 1970). 

Affiliations 

National Association of Manufacturers/Council of Manufacturing Associations. 
U.S. Chamber of Commerce/Committee of 100. 
American National Standards Institute. 
American Society of Association Executives. 
Key Industry Associations Committee. 
Clifford H. Rees Scholarship Foundation. 
North American Technician Excellence. 
MIT Alumni Association. 
USNA Alumni Association. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

42 

Military Officer’s Association. 
Surface Navy Association. 
U.S. Naval institute. 
Naval Historical Foundation. 

NAVAL CAREER BIOGRAPHY OF WILLIAM G. SUTTON 

Rear Admiral, United States Navy, Retired 

Admiral Sutton hails from Brunswick, Georgia, and was commissioned upon grad-
uation from the United States Naval Academy. He holds a Master of Science Degree 
in  Naval  Architecture  and  Marine  Engineering  from  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of 
Technology. 

At  sea  he  served  aboard  USS  JONAS  INGRAM  (DD  938)  as  ASW  Officer,  USS 
PAUL (FF 1080) as Weapons Officer, USS SURIBACHI (AE 21) as Operations Offi-
cer  and  Navigator,  participating  in  deployments  to  the  North  Sea,  Mediterranean 
Sea,  and  Middle  East.  He  was  the  commissioning  Executive  Officer  of  USS  KIDD 
(DDG 993), lead ship of her class, and was responsible for its initial outfitting, orga-
nization  and  the  crew  certification  process.  He  commanded  USS  CALLAGHAN 
(DDG  994)  which  deployed  to  the  Straits  of  Hormuz  during  the  ‘‘Tanker  War.’’  As 
Commander,  Destroyer  Squadron  TWO  FOUR,  Admiral  Sutton  deployed  to  the 
Adriatic  Sea  during  the  Yugoslavian  conflict,  and  twice  deployed  to  the  North  Red 
Sea  as  Maritime  Interception  Force  Commander,  enforcing  U.N.  sanctions.  He  also 
served  as  Chief  of  Staff  for  Commander  Second  Fleet  and  Commander  Striking 
Fleet; and was Director of the Maritime Forces Joint Staff, Commander, Joint Task 
Force  120  during  Haitian  and  various  Atlantic,  Caribbean,  and  NATO  contingency 
and planning operations. 

Ashore, Admiral Sutton served as Naval Aide to President Reagan 1982–1985; Di-
rector of Programs, Navy Office of Legislative Affairs 1990–1992; Director, Prospec-
tive  Commanding  Officer/Executive  Officer  Course  at  Surface  Warfare  Officers 
Schools Command in Newport, Rhode Island; and as an instructor in Naval Systems 
Engineering  at  the  U.S.  Naval  Academy.  He  was  Commander,  Naval  Base  Pearl 
Harbor,  Hawaii  and  Commander,  Naval  Surface  Group  Middle  Pacific  from  Sep-
tember 1996 until January 1999, overseeing the major shore infrastructure changes 
resulting from the regionalization process. Admiral Sutton’s last assignment was as 
Commander,  Amphibious  Group  TWO  from  5  February  1999  until  his  transition  to 
the  retired  list  in  July  2000.  He  was  responsible  for  all  Atlantic  Fleet  amphibious 
force readiness, maintenance, and training; and he participated in the LPD 17 ship 
class  design  process.  Collaterally,  he  was  Task  Force  Commander  for  recovery  ef-
forts following the crash of EgyptAir Flight 990 off the coast of Newport, Rhode Is-
land in November 1999. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Admiral. 
Mr. Spoehel, I forgot to ask you to introduce your family. Please 

do. 

Mr. SPOEHEL. I thank you for that opportunity. They are actually 
on  an  extended  vacation  with  family,  out  of  the  state,  at  the  mo-
ment. 

The CHAIRMAN. You’re a good husband. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. SPOEHEL. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. On behalf of the Committee, I’d like to thank all 
of  the  nominees.  Your  documents  have  been  received.  Your  discus-
sions  have  been  heard.  And  they’ll  be  all  made  part  of  the  record. 
The Committee—and I speak for all of them—are very impressed 
with  your  background,  your  experiences,  and  your  contributions  to 
our Nation. We thank you for your service in the past, and we look 
forward to your service in the future. And we thank you for serving 
our country. 

To  demonstrate  our  confidence  in  you,  your  nominations  will  be 
taken  up  by  the  Committee  on  Thursday.  I  can  assure  you  it  will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

43 

be  reported  out,  and,  before  we  go  on  recess,  you  will  be  Secre-
taries. 

So, congratulations to all of you, and congratulations to the fami-

lies. Thank you very much for your service. 

[Applause.] 
The CHAIRMAN. The Committee stands adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 10:30 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  holding  today’s  hearing.  These  individuals  have 
been  selected  to  serve  vital  positions  within  our  government  and  I  thank  them  for 
their willingness to serve. 

I am very pleased to see Vice Admiral Barrett here today. He has been a tremen-
dous  asset  to  the  country  and  has  demonstrated  a  great  understanding  of  Alaska, 
both  as  a  member  of  the  Coast  Guard  and  in  his  capacity  as  Administrator  of  the 
Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration. 

Before joining the Department of Transportation, Vice Admiral Barrett had a dis-
tinguished career in the United States Coast Guard and spent many years stationed 
throughout the gulf coast of Alaska. Most recently, he served as Commander of the 
Seventeenth  Coast  Guard  District  and  had  an  impressive  accident-free  search  and 
rescue program that saved 675 lives before going on to serve as Vice Commandant. 
In 2005, Vice Admiral Barrett was confirmed as the first Pipeline and Hazardous 
Materials  Safety  Administrator.  He  has  worked  tirelessly  to  improve  the  safety  of 
our  Nation’s  pipelines  and  was  extremely  helpful  to  this  committee  as  we  worked 
to craft the pipeline safety bill last Congress. 

This  Committee  has  a  close  working  relationship  with  Vice  Admiral  Barrett  and 
I look forward to continuing that relationship. I congratulate him on his nomination. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Today, I have want to reiterate my strong support for 
the  nomination  of  Paul  Brubaker  as  Administrator  of  the  Research  and  Innovative 
Technology Administration (RITA) at the Department of Transportation. 

I have known Paul as an individual who is deeply committed to public service and 
the public good. Most especially, I’m familiar with Paul through his tenure with my 
former colleague—and former colleague to a number of us here—the esteemed Sen-
ator  Bill  Cohen.  And,  in  fact,  while  working  for  Bill  on  the  Senate  Subcommittee 
on  Oversight  of  Government  Management,  Paul  was  the  principal  staff  architect  of 
the  Clinger-Cohen  Act—which  provided  a  critical  modernization  by  requiring  that 
the  government  information  technology  ‘‘shop’’  be  operated  exactly  as  an  efficient 
and profitable business would operate. 

So  while  Paul  may  not  be  a  native-born  Mainer,  given  his  tremendous  contribu-
tions  on  Senator  Cohen’s  staff,  we’ve  never  held  that  against  him!  In  fact  we  are 
very pleased to consider him an honorary Mainer! 

Paul has also served with distinction at the then-U.S. General Accounting Office, 
and  served  as  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  and  Deputy  Chief  Information  Officer  at 
the U.S. Department of Defense. But Paul brings to this critical leadership position 
at  RITA  a  unique  and  impressive  record  not  only  in  public  service,  but  also  in  the 
private sector as well. 

His  seasoned  and  accomplished  background  in  both  business  and  public  service 
will  undoubtedly  serve  Paul  and  the  country  well  in  this  position,  which  requires 
him to administer and lead RITA, created to coordinate DOT’s research and develop-
ment  investment  with  the  objective  of  identifying  and  facilitating  cross-modal  solu-
tions  to  America’s  transportation  challenges.  RITA  enables  DOT  to  more  effectively 
manage  its  research  portfolio  and  advance  the  development  and  implementation  of 
innovative technologies. 

Paul  is  ideally  positioned  to  assume  this  pivotal  role  and  succeed  at  a  high  level 
as part of the overarching effort to advance an effective and safe transportation sys-
tem for our Nation. He is poised to implement President Bush’s goal of an American 
transportation  system  that  ‘‘. . .  renews  our  commitment  to  increasing  transpor-
tation safety and to keeping our transportation system on the leading edge of tech-
nology.’’ 

(45) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

With that, I want to thank the Chairman and again urge my colleagues to support 

this exemplary candidate. 

46 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN WARNER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Chairman Inouye, Senator Stevens, and my other distinguished colleagues on the 
Senate’s Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, I thank you for holding 
this confirmation hearing today. 

Today,  I  am  pleased  to  speak  on  behalf  of  Ronald  Spoehel  of  Virginia  who  has 
been nominated to serve as the Chief Financial Officer (CFO) of the National Aero-
nautics and Space Administration (NASA). 

The  job  of  Chief  Financial  Officer  is  a  critical  one,  tasked  with  the  responsibility 
of  overseeing  NASA’s  overall  financial  well-being,  including  its  annual  budget  of 
about  $16.2  billion.  Mr.  Spoehel’s  strong  financial  background  coupled  with  his  ex-
tensive  management  experience  makes  him  well  tailored  to  serve  in  this  position. 
Subsequent  to  earning  his  B.S.  in  Economics,  M.S.  in  Engineering,  and  M.BA. 
from the University of Pennsylvania. Mr. Spoehel joined Bank of America where he 
quickly rose to the rank of Vice President. Including his tenure at Bank of America, 
Mr. Spoehel has over 25 years of experience and expertise as an officer or executive 
at  diverse  set  of  companies  ranging  from  investment  banking  firms  to  global  high- 
tech companies. 

Mr. Chairman, obviously, Mr. Spoehel is highly qualified to serve as Chief Finan-
cial  Officer  of  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration.  I  look  forward 
to the Committee’s favorable consideration of his nomination. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. TRENT LOTT TO 

RONALD R. SPOEHEL 

Question 1. Three years ago NASA broke ground on its first ever Shared Services 
Center (NSSC) in Mississippi at the Stennis Space Center with the intent of reduc-
ing redundant and inefficient administrative functions. All reports indicate that the 
Center is fulfilling its mandate of saving money on projects to reduce costs by estab-
lishing uniform procedures and processes in these areas. 

The NASA Chief Financial Officer (CFO) is an important customer of that Center. 
In order to realize full efficiencies of the Center, it is important that the CFO work 
to maintain and advance the NSSC transition schedule in a timely and responsible 
manner.  In  fact,  it  has  been  reported  that  the  Agency  is  on  target  to  consolidate 
the important financial functions of accounts payable and accounts receivable to the 
NSSC  by  the  beginning  of  calendar  year  2008.  Does  the  current  timeline  for  the 
NSSC to consolidate accounts payable and accounts receivable remain the beginning 
of calendar year 2008? 

Answer.  It  is  my  understanding  that  the  tentative  schedule  for  transitioning  ac-
counts  payable  and  accounts  receivable  remains  at  the  beginning  of  calendar  year 
2008.  If  confirmed,  I  would  review  the  schedule  and  plan  of  transition  and  work 
with my staff to help ensure the successful and timely transition of these key func-
tions to the NSSC. 

Question  2.  What  additional  mission  projects  as  well  as  new  capabilities  can  be 
assumed  by  the  NSSC  in  an  effort  to  advance  its  mission  through  centralizing  its 
administrative processes and saving the agency valuable funds? 

Answer.  It  is  my  understanding  that  the  NSSC  is  focusing  on  successfully 
transitioning  the  remainder  of  the  services  identified  for  transition  through  FY 
2008,  including  simplified  acquisitions  and  additional  human  resources  activities.  I 
have  been  informed  that  a  review  is  underway  of  other  activities  identified  in  the 
NSSC  Implementation  Plan  Report  as  requiring  further  study  and  that  NASA  is 
also  considering  other  activities  not  delineated  in  the  Implementation  Plan  Report 
for potential transition to the NSSC. 

Question  3.  Are  you  committed  to  ensuring  that  NSSC  remains  at  the  forefront 

of assuming consolidated administrative functions for NASA? 

Answer: Yes, if I am confirmed, I would be committed to ensuring that the NSSC 
remains  at  the  forefront  of  assuming  additional  consolidated  administrative  func-
tions.  From  my  prior  private  sector  experience,  I  recognize  the  efficiency  and  cost 
effectiveness of the shared services model for delivering support services with appro-
priately  designed  processes  and  internal  controls.  Consequently,  I  view  the  NSSC 
model  as  a  valid  cross-cutting  strategy  for  reducing  administrative  costs  and  en-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

47 

hancing  operational  efficiency  while  ensuring  strong  and  effective  internal  controls 
are maintained. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV 

TO VICE ADMIRAL THOMAS J. BARRETT 

Question 1. Can you please comment on how NHTSA chose its testing protocol for 
the occupant ejection rulemaking? Why does the agency believe that this is the best 
testing procedure to achieve the goal of reduced occupant ejection? 

Answer.  As  directed  by  SAFETEA–LU,  NHTSA  is  currently  developing  a  Notice 
of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM)  on  occupant  ejection.  The  Agency  has  been  work-
ing  on  a  test  method  that  represents  a  human’s  upper  body  and  the  forces  experi-
enced  during  a  rollover,  but  this  method  is  still  being  finalized.  I  assure  you  that 
the  Department  and  NHTSA  will  use  a  test  methodology  fully  supported  by  crash 
data and sound science to provide effective occupant protection. 

Question 2. The SAFETEA–LU legislation requires the reduction in both full and 
partial  ejections.  Can  you  please  comment  on  how  NHTSA’s  performance  standard 
will achieve this objective for all types of vehicle occupants? 

Answer.  The  Department  is  committed  to  fulfilling  Congressional  safety  require-
ments established by SAFETEA–LU for both full and partial ejections. We are work-
ing  hard  to  address  full  and  partial  ejections  through  new  performance  require-
ments  that  will  be  included  in  regulation.  The  specific  details  of  how  the  Depart-
ment  proposes  to  fulfill  these  requirements  are  still  under  development  and  will  be 
fully described in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking. 

Question 3. What technologies would be required to meet this testing protocol? 
Answer.  Side  curtain  and  advanced  glazing  technologies  are  possible  counter-

measures that manufacturers could employ to meet the testing protocol. 

Question  4.  Can  you  please  comment  on  the  cost  effectiveness  and  availability  of 

the technologies that will be needed to meet this testing protocol? 

Answer.  The  feasibility  and  cost  effectiveness  of  achieving  the  proposed  perform-
ance requirements is still being considered. They will be fully described in the Pre-
liminary Regulatory Impact Analysis when the NPRM is published. 

Question  5.  Are  the  technologies  that  would  be  required  to  meet  this  proposed 
testing protocol being used in vehicles today? Can you please comment on NHTSA’s 
plans for phase-in of the regulation? 

Answer.  Some  of  these  technologies  required  to  meet  this  testing  protocol  are  be-
ginning  to  appear  in  vehicles.  While  the  exact  details  of  NPRM  are  being  finalized, 
phase-in  of  the  performance  requirements  will  be  established  in  a  way  to  ensure 
that benefits from these important life-saving technologies can be realized as rapidly 
as is practicable. 

Question  6.  If  these  technologies  are  being  made  more  available  in  cars  today, 
would  it  seem  reasonable  to  expect  a  rapid  implementation  requirement  similar  to 
the 3 year phase-in recently proposed for electronic stability control? 

Answer.  While  these  technologies  are  beginning  to  appear  in  cars  today,  their 
ability  to  achieve  the  proposed  performance  requirements  may  not  be  comparable 
to  electronic  stability  control  systems  at  a  similar  stage  relative  to  the  regulatory 
process.  If  confirmed,  you  have  my  commitment  that  the  proposed  implementation 
schedule will be established to be quickly as is practicable. 

Question 7. Can you please comment on the timing of your rule development and 
if there are any potentially foreseeable obstacles that would prevent NHTSA’s meet-
ing the final rule deadline of October 1, 2009? 

Answer.  The  Department  is  committed  to  fulfilling  all  of  the  safety  requirements 
established  by  SAFETEA–LU.  At  this  time  does  not  foresee  obstacles  in  meeting 
them.  We  expect  to  have  a  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  issued  in  2008.  If  con-
firmed,  I  will  work  to  ensure  that  deadlines  for  this  and  all  SAFETEA–LU  regu-
latory requirements are met. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:08 Sep 05, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\75740.TXT JACKIE

